Some of the linux distros, as well as BSD, make this really easy. You don't need to tweak anything, it's "ready to compile". I don't bother with it myself.
Don't you think there's a line (sometimes blurry) between free speech and harassment?  Would it be ok for me to express my opinions through a megaphone outside your window at 3 in the morning?
Vote Pedro 
If you open a standard 600CCA car battery, you'll find six lead-acid cells in series.
Oil sand and shale extraction require massive quantities of fresh water and natural gas.  Severe shortages of both these things will render all such extraction impossible within the next ten years.  Shale oil and oil sands as saviors from the impending energy crisis is a pipe dream.
Lamest. English. Ever. Downmodded.  Also. Inaccurate. Idiot.
You really think those stories are fake?  Truly? And have you ever heard of HIPAA?  Your providers are not allowed to disclose any information to any entity except on a need to know basis for billing and treatment, in America, that is.  If the insurance companies know you have a genetic disorder, someone has broken the law, friend.  Medicare does what job for pennies on the dollar?  Are you serious?? Some information about Medicare and its "efficiencies"  &gt;n 1996, Congress funded an added $548 million over seven years for health-care fraud enforcement. FBI (2001)  &gt;Medicare lost $11.9 billion to waste, fraud and mistakes in 2000, half of what was lost five years ago from improper payments to doctors and hospitals. U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (2001)  &gt;Fraud amounts to 10 percent of U.S. healthcare expenditures. Government Accounting Office (1992), National Health Care Anti-Fraud Association (2001)  &gt;Seniors and other taxpayers pay up to $1 billion a year in inflated drug prices due to potential fraud and loopholes in Medicare. The overpayments represented 1/5 of Medicare spending in 2000. Government Accounting Office (2001)  &gt;http://www.insurancefraud.org/stats.htm  Of course, that is probably an insurance shill site, huh? So let's not talk any more about how efficient the Federal government is at providing health care insurance.  It is patently false and always will be in the current climate of "spend all you want; pay later" in Washington. For-profit insurance and providers protect  their investments and do all they can to prevent fraud; for profit, as I said.
I actually died a little inside when I read that. Hopefully he is using it as coasters, or to scare groups of angry crows.
That is a general flaw with income tax. In most systems with income tax, highly disproportionate amount of taxes are paid by the middle class.  No wonder even Einstein had a tough time understand income tax!
Are you getting rich from your ability to see the future?
The infographic with the article says he was shot to death!
I did. Made a lot. And to verstohlen, you must be an economic genius to know more than the fed board...
Clinton? Why are we talking about Hillary Clinton on reddit? The last time I checked, her name is not 'Ron Paul'.
I'm having trouble finding words for how impressed I am. You made a really mature, smart and difficult choice there. I can't imagine what that must have been like for you and your family. I hope the bastard's in jail. 
The problem is when you start associating "worth" with "value".
enter a comment herAdyashanti (Steven Gray) explores the contradictory nature of the search for security in spirituality. However the very desire for security causes suffering,which can only be eased by letting go and trusting in the Unknown.e
Well, Apple makes their money on the hardware. They don't care if you run Windows on it.
They got so owned, awesome. 
No surprise. The kids with any talent are smart enough to see that it's stupid to join an organization where, if you aren't killed or captured (and then killed) by 'the enemy', you may well get screwed over by your superiors and *then* jeered at at home for being a 'baby killer' thanks to the actions of a few bloodthirsty soldiers.
I'd go along with that.   Much easier to visualize.
Down vote me all you want, but that reply is beautiful.
Actually I do like the pictures.
Politically convenient promotion is a slightly different thing from deadly enforcement. The country you allude to are two different countries, one of which I am very happy not to live in. 
Nothing wrong with bringing a gun to work.  Workplace killers aren't stopped by "No Guns" signs.  "Gun free zones" are really just "disarmed victim zones".
You dont hit back, thats "tit for tat" domestic violence, thats "one up" payback DV.  That wont put an end to DV, it will only change the method, she still has issues that needs to be resolved.  You record what happened, then its her choice, domestic violence treatment or jail.  And, you might have a better relationship  after she completes DV. And if you have kids, women have a higher percentage of hurting children. Its about rebuilding the family and stopping violence, its not about punishing people.
or a bear with mange/malnutrition.
Thanks!  Those are some good parameters.
My downmods speak for themselves. Clearly I do not fit in with the hivemind.
&gt;God wishes you weren't so angry  wow... you just can't stop relaying divine knowledge can you? You're a prefect conduit between God and Man eh? Must be nice.  As for _your_ bible, take it with you while you again, Fuck Off. Seriously, THX
EMO!
Obviously, he was trained by Al Qaeda.  Fox News must be relishing in sweet vindication. "Take that John Stewart!  Infiltrated our network and filled it with morons, he says.  Ha!  We'll show him.  Sally, get me some snazzy graphics.  I'm feeling pumped.  You tell the people in the graphics department, I want not 1, not 2, but THREE muthafuckin' american flags to jump out naked and explode for this next news report.  Morons, my ass."
What about Sela? Those pointy ears are pretty nice...
Impending water and natural shortages go totally unmentioned.  The massive, unprecedented ecological harm and hideous cesspool wastelands oil sands extraction is producing go unmentioned.  This article is a bullshit pipe dream.  Within 15 years there will be effectively zero oil sands and oil shale extraction.
.fu2
This has got to be a shock to the folks who have defended him through all this.  My heart goes out to them.
&gt; we may need to handle cookies or proxies etc etc.  I don't see any cookie handling malcontent. But, to answer your question (noting that I don't have Python or BeautifulSoup on this machine.)   from BeautifulSoup import BeautifulSoup  import urllib  # load the RedHanded home page  doc = BeautifulSoup(urllib.urlopen("http://redhanded.hobix.com/index.html"))  # change the CSS class on links  for element in doc.find("span", {"class": "entryPermalink"}):   element["class"] = "newLinks"  # remove the sidebar  doc.find(True, {"id":"sidebar"}).extract()  # print the altered HTML  print doc   Now malcontent, my turn. Please show me the Ruby version of this   1 import urllib  2 import urllib2  3 import cookielib  4   5 def getCookie(user, pwd, uri, ua):  6  ckCont = cookielib.LWPCookieJar()  7  opener = urllib2.build_opener(urllib2.HTTPCookieProcessor(ckCont))  8  opener.addheaders = [('User-Agent', ua)]  9  data = urllib.urlencode({'id':user, 'pwd': pwd, 'dologin': 'yes'})  10  opener.open(uri, data)  11  return ckCont  12   13 def storeCookie(ck, file_path):  14  ck.save(file_path)  15   16 def retrieveCookie(file_path):  17  ckCont = cookielib.LWPCookieJar(file_path)  18  ckCont.load()  19  return ckCont  You need to retrieve a cookie set by the responding server. I've already written this in Ruby, and was most disheartened with the Ruby stdlib as a result, so please feel free to pleasantly surprise me.
God wishes you wouldn't talk about his holy word like that. Gods wrath is swift an merciless. I'll pray for you.
This is the full story, linked to in HuffPo. This video here includes Russert's subsequent question to Obama, which isn't in the video appearing in the [HuffPo linkjack](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2007/10/31/kucinich-i-did-see-a-u_n_70566.html).
I think we should compromise.   * 6 can be Bush's fault. * 6 Al Qaeda * 4 Aliens * 2 The KGB in connection to the ghost of Lee Harvey Oswald. * 2 God in wrath of liberal ideals and such. * 1 Immigrants * 1 Slavery  And then obviously the 'accidental' one started by this boy. (Who was obviously in the pay of the British Monarchy)
Money price has nothing at all to do with whether or not it is an energy source if it is a *net* loss of energy it is not a source rather a sink. Yes it may a more convenient *form* of energy but it would not be a source.
He wants to put a hard currency in competition with the federal reserve notes.
Fantastic!
is this a victimless crime ?
One quite important aspect of the use of IEDs in Iraq that was missing from this article was that of motivation. A people fighting to drive out invaders and occupiers of their country, will be far more motivated, and will be spurred to faster innovation, than those fighting for someone else's profits and lies. We saw that in Vietnam, and the neoclowns in this administration obviously ignored that lesson.  The U.S. troops are beginning to wake up to the real reasons they have been sent there, just as they were before the U.S. lost Vietnam. The Iraqi resistance fighters have known it from day one.
Aircraft carrier
I would be if that Irish bug McFly hadn't stolen my 2015 Sports Almanac.
(taken from digg)  There is indeed a problem with our society, but not what the poster thinks. Since when has it been ok to "take" what someone else has, just because they have more? Just because it is in the name of taxes, doesn't mean that it isn't stealing. Socialism in whatever form is what is ruining the country. The idea that it is justified to take more from those who have more is a fundamentally immoral argument. No matter how well spent that money is, it is still stolen money. The idea that you are entitled to that which you did not earn is in direct opposition to what this country was founded upon. Those who believe that it is the Government's responsibility to take care of you from birth till death will continue to spend more and more of the money that isn't theirs to spend. The surprise is that those who call for more Government control of areas of our life, are the same ones who distrust the Government most.  The answer is not taxing/punishing those who succeed, it is reducing taxes for all Americans, and also reducing the wasteful/bureaucratic government that the collectivist mentality has created.  IMHO
You wrote "The lease is a farce." The US responds "Hey, as long as I get mine."
To the downvotes- that was sarcasm.
Someone thinks that headcrab is a snark or face crab. What kind of geeks ARE they? Seriously?
When will this be true of movies.
&gt;you must be an economic genius to know more than the fed board  bwahahahaahahaha  oh man i hope that was tonge in cheek! "we meet in secret, answer to no one and never have to explain ourselves! how could we not be the smartest economic minds!"
maybe you were just a lamer
No one said the Marine was gay.
&gt;It's disheartening to see people who dedicate themselves to defending gay rights cheer when closeted homosexuals are outed against their will (as long as they're Republcans). Wait wait wait.  I may well have missed it, but I don't think anyone was cheering just because *Republicans* got outed--as far as I understood it, that little extra nicety was rather tangential to the cheering.   I thought the cheering--and very well justified it was--came when politicans who demonize gays and champion laws that prosecute and segregate homosexuality, turn out to be flaming hypocrites who're pursuing this out of demagoguery and self-hating personality disorders, and not just to support some pristine codex of truth and justice after all.   That they're Republican may well be linked in to their attitudes, and icing on the cake to people who loathe what the GOP has come to stand for in this past decade, but I don't think the people who are cheering would be doing so if the outed person hadn't been attempting such harm to gay rights to begin with, while hypocritically hiding his own homosexual activities.
&gt; There is so much bullshit in one post that it is hard to know where to start.  &gt;   &gt; You might have had a point, but you mixed it in with so many provable falsehoods that you shot your credibility to shit. You think people would be more cordial when they're talking about *XML, the most boring form of communication in the world.*
&gt;Why do you think he wants to do that?  Because he's:  - Anti-choice - Anti-gay marriage  But he claims to want to follow the US Constitution, the 14th Amendment of which is VERY specific about citizens of the United States having equal protection under the law. Interesting, huh? If he really loved the Constitution as much as he claims to, he would support:  - Outlawing vasectomies - Outlawing heterosexual marriage
That might be *a* gPhone. gPhone will be an open software platform for smartphone hardware, not an actual physical product. Google is trying to get LG and other handset makers to support the software in their products, and Verizon and other carriers to support it on their networks.  See here: http://www.dbtechno.com/phones/2007/10/31/google-in-talks-with-verizon-about-gphone/
No, one law suit per funeral
When you watch the video of them on the street corner, how badly do you want to see a car careen out of control and take them all out? End of argument and everyone is happy.
You should complete that quote, as it is the most important part of this story.  &gt; "I used to break into houses at three o'clock in the morning with 10 other men, after throwing a flash grenade through the window," Cooper says. "I would drag Mom and Dad away and send the kids to the department of human services — over a bag of pot — and totally ruin that entire family. I started reaping what I had sown."
"has complained that he pays a lower rate of tax than any of his staff"  If he belives what he says he can always write a check to the IRS and pay more. Unless, of course, he is just a billionaire blowhard.
kexp.org  Real music for intelligent people!
vengence? does that mean we can attack whomever we like? I think that has been around a long time before this and it doesn't need any excuse either. Hate is in our DNA
The answer is not to throw more good money (that we don't have) after bad.  Medicare is an utter failure due to fraud and inefficiency and  adding more money to that pot will not make it any better. And you totally dismissed my assertion from above, so it must be true. Silence is consent. &gt;I don't want irresponsible people who take no care of their own health (which, BTW seems to be a lot of Americans based on obesity numbers) to have UNLIMITED ACCESS to all the healthcare they want. At my expense. It is just an incentive to do nothing about the underlying problem.
It's awful that their legal system does nothing to discourage that kind of offense. Hopefully Alex wins the case, and doesn't contract HIV. 
You're missing the entire point.  He's not apologizing, he's going through (sp changed) the motions of an apology.  But since he doesn't take responsibility, all he's doing is just trying to cover his ass.  That's not an apology.
and the more left wing are all cowards and dhimmis
That's a handy one, cheers.
There are no mysteries. It was done. It was expensive and they have 800 lbs of moon rocks in 30,000 samples examined by 300,000 geologists over 40 years - and they all agree: these rocks came form the moon, when it was impossible to return them in any way except by people picking them up and bringing them back.  That is the one and ONLY fact needed to debunk any and every moronic suggestion the landings were faked.  Anyone who thinks it was a hoax does not have the ability to distinguish fact from fiction. Remembering that two people can keep a secret, but only if one of them is dead, can assist these morons also.
I do think the ruby example is more elegant.  If you want a high level library (which uses hpricot) for handling cookies and such see mechanize  http://mechanize.rubyforge.org/mechanize/
Yeah that's true.  It was the intrinsic musical value that I was referring to that hasn't changed, but I suppose music is far easier and cheaper to come by these days so I suppose in that way its value is diminished.  I guess where Trent and I differ then is whether or not that's a bad thing.  I would say it's not in the slightest :)
That costume is totally hardcore.
&gt;Why marry someone who thinks that violence is an appropriate way to express hurt feelings? She must have huge tits!  DV is more than violence, and under law, its almost everything a person can do in a relationship. (No joke, tough on DV means almost any action or communication can be classified as DV).  DV should be mandatory in school, teach kids about this stuff, and bullying, sexism (both genders), and understanding can help build a better generation. 90% of people in DV are not insane, they just dont know how to handle their emotions and havnt had the time to think about it. There is 10% that is criminal and has mental issues.  The subject is so large, but its one of the most important, misunderstood, and gender biased towards men. Until blaming goes away, and real cure towards DV, everyone loses. 
It was a joke.  I am well aware that the religious deal with America is significantly different than in Saudi Arabia.  Thought it sort of fit the "Imperial March" tone of the video but I guess not.
No.  Why the uber-wealthy in general?  I've never understood that.  Because the perception is that they don't deserve money or have gotten it as some sort of birth-right?  Why?  You are correct that taxes should be equal but if you advocate a disproportionate tax on the rich then why would anyone want to be advance themselves.
The WBC has ben geting away with their insults because everyone has been pretty much ignoring them. If someone were to attck them, they'd claim interference in their free speech rights. But if a whole lot of people attending a funeral the WBC was bothering decided to attack them, then the authorities could arrest the WBC for inciting a riot. It appears this "church" doesn't have any church building where they worship their Satan. None I could find anyhow. Too bad. I wonder why the Phelps assholes haven't been hit at home? Why hasn't anyone found where they live and set up 24 hour pickets outside their window? These wastes of flesh need to disappear like the O'Haires did. No glory, just gone and forgotten. No real investigation, just more garbage gone. Let them rot in a landfill.
Sure. You still have to be able to read the code to know what it's going to do on your system, though. Which puts most users back into the "trust your source" camp they're already in, except it takes longer to install software for no good raisin.
This will help you if you let it. Life is a journey, don't be like me and learn everything the hard way... Good luck and please send me your comments... drenchzgrinch@yahoo.com   please put article title in subject line, please send no spam... 
The issue in this case is not that they said the things that they did. The issue, which the jury agreed with, was that they conspired to create emotional distress and invaded the privacy of the family.   Moreover, George Bush and Slain Marine are apples and oranges. George Bush is a PUBLIC figure who SOUGHT his public status. Neither the marine, nor his family, can say the same.  That's like saying that I can pick a random child off the street and plaster photographs of her all over tabloids simply because I have the right to "free expression." That's simply not what the law allows.   This is not a free expression issue. It's an issue of ensuring that the general public has a right to peace and privacy in their daily lives. The Phelps family argued that a funeral is a "public event," but a JURY OF THEIR PEERS disagreed. 
The internet just redeemed itself for that thing a while back where people in a video chat egged a guy on into killing himself.
Please don't mod me down for this, but I believe this deserves a "wow."
dude, that pic is totally convincing!  How did you pull that off? 
No it's not. I have way more than 62 pieces, that means someone in the world have less than 62 pieces. That's madness.
Vaginal flagellation.
I don't think this has anything to do with free speech.  No one's censoring their opinions, we're just condemning the actions they took to express those opinions -- actions which infringed on the rights of others.  &gt; You don't see people cheering after convicts have been executed get fines for "inflicting emotional distress".  Maybe because that's less "emotionally distressing"?
Everyone needs a hobby...
The Discovery Channel, purportedly an educational channel, already blurs out dog and other animal genitalia in many shows.  A corrollary to my prediction, BTW, would be that bestiality will increase by at least 300% per capita. "Deny lust and you will be molested by strange temptations."  It just seems to be proven true over and over.
Torquemada's minions thought it was their religious responsibility to purify the souls of their victims. These victims were never dehumanised, for the torturers did everything in their power to save their souls. I am sure they, too, would have maintained that they were doing it all out of compassion: saving the soul from the devil. Given a choice, however, I'll pick the US military and their dehumanisation any time. 
What about the 0% tax crowd who don't make much money and spend their spare time shooting out bastard children, smoking cigarettes, lining the pockets of McDonalds execs., and partying till 3am every night so that us working stiffs can't sleep.  I'm equally sickened.
Ah, and your response is to call me a cunt.  And you wonder why I so easily call out your sexism?  As for your second line, you've loaded it so that any response to it makes me either a loser, which is a pretty petty put-down, or some evil domineering woman who wants to control my husband.  The problem is, I'm a man, dipshit.  Way to think things through there.  If I defended gay people, would you assume I'm outright gay?  Since I'm going against sexism and you're assuming I'm a woman, it follows that you would.  And you're retarded for it.
I've noticed this as well. Also I have been having trouble getting my votes to stick (Safari). I'll vote on something, read another story, and when I return my vote seems to be gone. I dont know if this could be related but I can't seem to get any feedback on the problem one way or another.
YOU are the most believeable USP any proposition could have.
Looks like a Blackberry.  But what cellphone doesn't these days, dang
Phelps has closet homosexual written all over him.
YOU are the most believeable USP any proposition could have.
Mind explaining what's "neato" about this?  I'm slightly confused.
Yeah its amazing isn't it. They can look at a plan that calls for freezing a whole ring of ground rock, then boiling the rock inside this ring, for YEARS, and say "that's bollocks".  BTW want to see some of that rich 'oil' bearing rock? http://www.theviewfromthepeak.net/images/oilshalerock.jpg  Yep, that dirty stone is your saviour. Happy?
What? Did you miss this? &gt;He voted against the protection of marriage act.  And his personal choices should not and will not, per him, influence his adherence to the Constitution.  I have to take him at his word and he is much more trustworthy than any of the other candidates. If this is your greatest concern about Ron Paul, you should get on board because there are MUCH BIGGER fish to fry than that! Beside that, do you really want more government babysitting and entitlements?  That is what you will get from the same old Hillary/Rudy/Romney, etc. crowd. Did you hear them on the debate last night talking about all of the programs they want to start or expand?  That stuff is not free!
While I agree that the average band will not be able to record their own album, I would say all it takes is for them to meet one audiophile geek and then suddenly you have a professional quality album for next to nothing.  The cost of the technology is at that breaking point where it's more about the knowledge of how to use that technology and not the technology itself.  I think that is the main point everyone is trying to make.
Does anyone actually listen to "regular" radio anymore? I went to Sirius 2 years ago and would NEVER go back.  They have a whole freakin' Springsteen station!
Oh shit. I was laughing at your sarcasm, then I realized that you were the same guy posting before and I realized it wasn't sarcasm.  Seriously... you need to stop praying and start medicating yourself.
Edited for clarity/accuracy (thanks brianator).  The verdict was based on inflicted emotional distress. These people disrupted the funeral with things they knew would be upsetting and hurtful. I think the verdict seems pretty sound.  It is my understanding that large awards have been reduced upon appeal in the past, especially when the jury is emotionally swayed.  I originally believed the free speech issues would also be reviewed upon appeal, however I'm not sure how this would work in civil court.
But you still need to read the code.  Compiling an open source app doesn't do you much good if the [source code is malicious](http://www.ussg.iu.edu/hypermail/linux/kernel/0311.0/0649.html).
And NASA at 16.8 Billion. Retarded.
That's a completely ideological position. Any reasonable adult knows that protesting at funerals is completely untenable if only for reasons of public order. 
I think the guy on the right has just had his shampooed or something because it's all sticking up. Poor thing is jealous as well.
The word Islam means submission/total surrender (to their god). It is based on ("divine") order and absolute obedience, not on love, compassion or peace. Since god is not real, that submission and obedience is usually to be given to other humans.
The press will prop her up and tear the others down - one by one.   Whether you want it or not the press has decided that she is your candidate. Deal with it. 
SmartPlanet is a new blog coming from the UK, where it was launched by CNET Networks UK. It's a one-stop guide to creating a smarter, greener and fairer planet, with an emphasis on energy-saving, ethical and organic products. You can find there the latest UK news on ethical shopping and living, from the hottest organic fashion and fresh Fairtrade grub to new solar gadgets and the coolest hybrid cars.
I don't think we should be paying income tax at all.  However, I probably pay more like 17% when I pay an accountant to do my taxes and deduct charitable contributions, etc.
That's no cop, that's Ronald D. Moore!
I didn't need that song in my head, though I would have liked to have seen her laying naked on the floor. This is how I feel.
It depends on your interpretation of our free expression rights. Are they there to encourage hate speech? Or are they there to ensure that the government never has the opportunity to silence dissenters? 
&gt; There's nothing in that article that mentions the songs' "Iraq War Criticism"  There are some vague suggestions in the lyrics ie. "who'll be the last to die for a mistake."  But it's quite a stretch to say that's why it's being censored. The "hits" have zero reference to Iraq, imo.
2.9 million dollars in real damages. Before punitive damages.
Wait, what?
I have come across these idiots.  Its rather anti-climatic.  A bunch of smiling people with a bunch of annoying signs.  Usually accompanied by a bunch of counter-protesters making more noise.
For most of the north eastern US and Canada the weather is shyte out.  Reddit: my antidrug drug
My 55 year old father likes it too
I don't get it -- is the trick posting a link to some myspace music so that people will be tricked into listening to it? Also, not programming.
lol - sooooooo true
No, no - you meant ADD. OCD Redditors would be happy with less turnover because it's easier to keep the whole page purple. 
Now just redirects to the main blog page.
none due to the drug war? Interesting, I guess it isn't so bad after all!
i think you have the wrong comment. i didnt post a picture?
Good definition of a bell curve.
Thanks!  I had no idea there had been research done on this.
getting too spammed with Garbage BS political commentary/opinion and pseudoscience 
A physical blow in the head with an ashtray.  People get brain damage and die from splitting their skulls on the pavement after a shot like that.  Even repeated concussions cause brain damage, and an ashtray to the head is likely to give you one.  Shit, boxing with big pillows on your hands can still leave people crippled.  And the hardest blows are the ones you don't expect - if you're not in guard or ready to roll with a punch, head shots with any power are going to knock you out.  What can an ashtray do?   It's very clear you've never studied self-defense in any meaningful form.  The more I box the more scared I am of street fights.  One slip-up like an exposed chin for a sucker punch and you're done for if the person has any strength.  An ashtray can split your skull.  And it's not uncommon in any way for people to die after falling and cracking their heads.   In other words, you don't seem to understand how serious physical blows are, particularly head shots.  I imagine this is because you've never really been in a fight.  If you think trading physical blows for an emotional/ethical one is fair, go to a boxing gym, pick a person, and insult their mother.  Then go in the ring with them.  That should straighten you out.  
How can you prevent something which hasn't happened, but may yet occur?  Answer: impossible.  Lame headline and assertion. Downmodded.
Suddenly I'm getting a big [Poe's Law](http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=Poe's+Law) vibe from this thread.
What planet do you live one? We HAVE NOT been ignoring them.  Everytime they issue a press release it hits the front page, everytime they show up somewhere, it hits the front page.  Its time we start IGNORING them.
That's why i insist on having my face twirled when people take pictures of me.  WAIT WHAT?
It's a source of convenient energy.  I guess if your argument was purely semantic, then congratulations, it is correct; but completely pointless.
Nobody has the right not to be bothered. While  the guy screaming outside your window is a complete jerk, he has a right to be. That is, as long as he doesn't run afoul of something else (obstructing the street, trespassing on your property, etc).
So 30 years ago Canadian was... now American?  What's it like living in the future?
I wonder how much Clear Channel is expecting in Payola.   Whoops.  Did I say that?  My bad.
So, wait, he gets raped, and the authorities then call HIM gay, and plan on charging him, the VICTIM?  I heard the middle east had crazy laws, but, seriously, how does that even make SENSE?!
You have no idea how hard it is for me to keep the pattern of Purple Blue Purple Purple Blue Purple Purple Purple Blue ... I clear my cache and reclick the links a few times a day BUT THEY KEEP MOVING WHY DO THEY MOVE!?!?!
We also have some of the largest reserves of water and natural gas in the world.  I would love to see alternative energy, but right now it is not profitable in the same way oil is, and neither the American government nor the Canadian is far-sighted enough to realize that oil is obsolete.
Wonder if they'll get screwed on their govt. life insurance policies...
&gt;I, for one, respect my own ideas and the ideas of my compatriots enough to engage and persuade others in a free and open forum - and not with the tools of power. I think you're right that in many situations--not all, but this one included--words are a more ecologically sound combative approach over the long term.   But, ironically for someone advocating a persuasive rather than forceful approach, it really doesn't help to be so smug and dismissive while explaining how much you like your own choices in the matter.
&gt; The people with the greatest incentive to do something are the drug users. I'm not saying they are all lazy (though many are)  I could be a conspiracy as well to genetically manipulate marijuana to reduce ambition. This would create an easily suppressed group that didn't care they were being suppressed!
To use one point driven into the ground by the WBC and others, there is a big difference between saying, "I think homosexuality is wrong" and "God hates fags."  One is an expression of opinion.  The other is an expression of hate.  Hatred should not be tolerated, ever.  Now, if the Hannitys and O'Reillys of the world want to glom onto the word 'hate' and use it for their own purposes, that's their business.  That they choose to use the word 'hate' to spread lies about their opposition should in no way, ever, dissuade me from using the same word.  I do not relinquish the use any word or phrase merely because they choose to misuse it.  That is, after all, precisely their goal.  I would point out that you have just done exactly the same thing.  You want to describe my intolerance of hate as 'poverty.'  That is your privilege, though I imagine there aren't many people that would agree with you.  A well-honed argument?  'Hate should not be tolerated, ever' *IS* my well-honed argument.  Are you really going to argue in favor of spreading hatred?  Seriously?  And as for a 'barrel of a gun' - you, sir, are the first one to mention firearms, and the potential harm they bring, in this discussion.  Responding to my point of view with extreme aggrandizement does nothing to disprove my point of view, but it does show that you are the extremist you accuse me of being.  Good day.
Ha Ha, these guys give the good churches a bad name.
No. Sorry.
http://www.airborn.com.au/photo1/workshop.html
No thanks.  The Chinese market looks very frothy right now.  
Oh wait, you're still avoiding the fact that she *assaulted him*. Would you take the same position if the roles were reversed?
Dwight Schrute.   Identity theft is not a joke, Jim!
pass the cool aid  (jonestown cool aid that is )
i wish Google Translate worked for British to American
You can click on next to see stories with less upvotes - these stories are often better anyway.
Sort of ruins the "cloud" effect though, doesn't it? If you're going to to do this, why not just use a list?
I'm sure that this guy's just going to want to kill himself even more once he gets his medical bills.
For all they want to be... middle eastern countries still have a LONG way to go.   The King Abdullah University seems like an interesting place to go to school... oh, except... it's in Saudi Arabia... I'd be terrified. I mean, who would really want to go to school someplace where rights and freedoms are SOOO restricted?
Ditto on removing politics. But I do not miss the US bashing links. At all.
I doubt AMEX has done a whole lot to "slap" Best Buy in this case. They may do a charge back or just eat the cost of the hard drive. The major credit card companies tend to do this for consistent customers.
Come to Dubai for a vacation!   Umm, no.
I wasn't particularly impressed.  He sounded like a politician.  If it quacks like a duck... 
i dressed up as your dad.  the only thing I wore was your mom.
You guys realize that there is a musical called 'Spamalot' in production?
Neocons are primarily differentiaed by foreign policy, calling her a neocon because of real or perceived domestic just shows that you are just using neocon as a generic catch-all phrase for policies you don't like (Sorta like facist is used)
Having wanton women around is a great pleasure...until you find yourself falling in love with one. Then..not so much.
He must be the Goatse man.
[dupe](http://www.baltimoresun.com/news/local/bal-westboro1031,0,7191706.story?coll=bal_tab01_layout)  [dupe](http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20071031/ts_nm/iraq_gay_lawsuit_dc) both on the front page 
Let's work to get Mike Huckabee elected.  He is one of the few true conservatives on the ticket.  Is his record spotless?  No.  Do I believe he'll put the interests of the US ahead of his own?  Without a doubt.
Hah... more witty commentary in the headlines.  Fewer boring regurgitated CNN headlines.   Let us know your opinion and bias!
Everyone is in big debt when they finish an undergraduate degree. Obviously more for Law, but you still have debt when you start your PhD. Doing a PhD isn't going magically get you out of debt either. It's just going to help the size of the debt balloon whilst you forestall paying it off (because the PhD scholarship isn't enough to actually repay debt).
What ever happened to all the money they collected to buy that oil platform country?
One of the Python regulars happened to be gay, (Graham Chapman) so I am not sure what you are really getting at here.
When I read it the first thing I thought was: "Well sure... but isn't it, like, horribly impractical?"
I've heard this before, but I don't believe you.  I don't believe this is a reason you dislike homosexuals (if you do) or, more broadly, why anyone does.  I think it's completely irrelevant in a discussion about homophobia and disingenuous to bring it up, frankly.
and the other 90% of the electorate are going to hear about you how?
What on earth does it mean for molecules to combine chemically rather than biologically?!
Yep. No doubt quite soon this is traced back as a provocateur trying to associate criminal spam activity with Paul's campaign. I know plenty of people that will help find out for free.
totally!
if my wife treated me like that, I'd divorce her in a heartbeat. the fact that he married her at all shows she has his balls in a vice.
&gt; You know what EVERY SINGLE prospective judge's campaign plank was? That he's tough on crime. Every single goddamn one of them.  I think you'll find this suspicious trend all around the country. If we really want fair elections we need to support more of the "soft on crime" judges. The ones where they give the benefit of the doubt to the criminals.  * Rape would be an innocent misunderstanding. * Burglary and car theft would become after school programs * murder would become let-bygones-be-bygones
i agree...AWESOME idea.
Tell 'em to say "Luke sent them."
His best friend in high school is now feeling a bit guilty because he once told him that he should set his standards a bit lower.
Mis-leading headline. The article is about how his odds of becoming have INCREASED, not been slashed.  
I did. I also tried other suggestions...waaaaah, wahooturd, wahoowhat? among others. But by popular demand I am back.
awesome.  i love bolling.
No argument here.
An oldie but goodie; I think the main reason I like it is that he held the date by dropping features -- if only the real world worked like this.
I retract. Change it to "all_ways_smilin'"
There were other computing machines before the ENIAC. The one that springs first to mind is the [Atanasoff-Berry Computer](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Atanasoff%E2%80%93Berry_Computer), which was made to solve systems of up to 29 linear equations. It uses vacuum tubes and capacitor-based memory similar to modern DRAM. (I walk by a working replica of this thing on my way to classes most days. It's pretty cool.)  [Differential analyzers](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Differential_analyser) were used to numerically solve differential equations back in the days before digital computers became non-sucky.  People used to do similar things with inductors, resistors, capacitors, and op-amps: they would connect these little boxes with wires and use it to analyze some mathematical system. These analog computers used to be a pretty big deal.
I literally gave up, the moment I heard the question. 
Anyone who has ever been in the military should know that the government doesn't actually hold that much influence.  The higher echelons do pretty much whatever they want.
Thats ok, in my U.S. high school, the same number had heard of them.  Of course, that was BEFORE cable.
&gt;&gt;He should get spanked for this, by everyone in California.  Oh, man, don't say that.  You'll have half the adults in the Bay Area lining up to start fires. SHEESH.
"For the claim to be successful, the jury needed to conclude that the church's actions at the funeral -- and later, in a posting about Matthew Snyder on its Web site -- were "highly offensive to a reasonable person," according to the jury instructions."  Problem is, their actions were highly offensive to a reasonable person. The jury made the right decision given their directions. I still don't get why they were given those directions though, I suspect a biased judge. Either way, the case was over whether the father's privacy was invaded, and I think it was given the nature of funerals. 
funny hearing someone say,   "That the record has been created is a very very good sign" sorta like... close but no cigar...scooter is scootin to dubai on a 15Million dollar island in the massively constructed island model of the world. he's old and rich. game over but who cares- since theres probably not a hell. id personally get a heart attack either way, talk about fuckin stress man. 
NNNNNOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO   i was hoping it was ron paul  NNNNNNNNNOOOOOOOOO
There is no amendment in the federal constitution allowing drug use.
no he won't, he'll have others do it for him.
*One* can... provided he has a decent shirt (erm... elvin cloak of invisibility?)
How to Get Your First (or Next) Business Loan offers basic advice for getting a business loan if you’ve never had one before, or even if you have.
I'm not going to downmod you for your point of view, but I'm going to downmod you for your very mention of the downmod. I'm sick of posters on here who caveat their comments with 'I'll be downmodded for this but...' and similar. 
really?  *before* laprice mentioned it?  good lord!
(A) No one speeds.  (B) Cops don't *have* to catch speeders.  (C) Speed trap is shut down. *Who's* the moron?  Oh, yeah... it's you.
I'm in Australia and I even though I can't do shit about it - I'm supporting Ron Paul even if it is illegal for a foreigner to donate csah to a candidate running for president.
Kitty!
We should spend less money on pointless wars and corrupt social programs, then we don't have to worry so much about sticking people with huge tax bills.
Well, that cinches it for me.
Yes, I would.  Because the reaction to the original offense has nothing really to do with the original offender's refusal to take responsibility for it.
YAY the dollar is going to sh*t. Please excuse me while I take a Bernanke and wipe myself with my worthless dollars.
Vader?  I never touched her!
excellent, thanks.
I think someone is maybe a little discombobulated since the front page has been filled with less left leaning, dare I say "extremist" articles since the new version. At least it seems that way to me.  Doesn't mean that the only people left are Paul supports and pic lovers tho. I am actually seeing a lot more quality articles on the front page coming from the subreddits, especially programming. That is a good thing.
As a person that has lived in Kansas all of my life where the "Church" is I have had to see and hear all of their crap for a long time.  On one hand I love the judgment.  On the other hand I think it will be overturned on appeal and they love the publicity. I do know for a fact though that the world will be a better place when Fred Phelps and his family get to meet God personally. 
isn't it odd that this is the second article with the wrong amount of damages in the headline?  Both this and the previous submission clearly state 10.9 million in the article, yet both of these misquote the articles and throw out the same wrong figure of 2.9 million.
he's a numb-nut
You can't outlaw being stupid.  ACLU would have a *shit* fit.
Lots of hearsay evidence to the intentional side.
&gt;A relationship in which one needs contracts with the state to enforce fidelity is an illusionary one.   Or a contractual one.  Before I lay out money for [cable, phone, utilities, paper delivery, appliance, car, or house (construction or maintenance)]  services, I want some assurance that the service will be performed as required.  At times in the past, for better or worse, marriage had some pretty clearly defined roles for men and women.  Presently, for better or for worse, those roles are not so well defined, and a great deal more negotiation ought to happen before a couple enters marriage.  "For better or worse" vows mean nothing anymore.  People must communicate and know - before they take  vows - what those vows mean, and what penalties will befall them when those vows are broken. Any couple who enters marriage without making some prenuptial agreements is comprised of one or more terribly ignorant persons.  I'm not saying that there should always be a contract, but given current divorce laws, both the groom and the bride must protect themselves as they walk down that rosy path, lest they fall (or are pushed by their spouse) into the ditch.   edit: added closing bracket] in 1st paragraph and deleted extraneous word "services"
&gt; actions which infringed on the rights of others.  Which rights were these? I don't recall any government guaranteed rights of freedom from verbal abuse at a burial. The whole Phelps clan is disgusting, but that doesn't excuse this disgusting use of our judicial system.
Alas . . just the fact they posted on craigslist where they can only hope to find the  loser men should warn you not to get involved with them. 
&gt; perhaps Neo-Reddit is doing something to prevent endless submissions from the same handful of sites over and over and over  Just what I've been thinking ;)
It was just loose editing by Channel 4. However much I like parts of the news they put on, it's fair to say that they work towards a more liberal (that's not the right word maybe leftist) agenda. I think possibly anti-conservative would be better.  
You've perfected Reddit. Congratulations!
It doesnt matter WHAT they preach, they have that right. Seriously. Its free speech. Amendment 1  Of course, if you can prove that god doesnt hate "fags", you can sue them for slander on the behalf of god...
&gt; Yeah, okay, I'll say it: Maybe Phelps is gay.  Maybe? *Maybe?*
This is a great article -- it shows that Edwards is in a race for President of high school while Huckabee is a serious candidate.
&gt; To make it possible to achieve such implementation conformance, the first step is knowing where the divergences are. I think they plan to fix it, or at least bully everyone else to their way of thinking.
WTF this is not reported in mainstream news?  It is not suprising that such thing happen in barbaric countries, but why does the west pretend at every opportunity that Dubai is a new Paris/London? Yeah sure UAE is rich now, but they still are the same beduin thugs as they use to be 100 yrs ago. 
You didn't read the article, did you? And I'm being nice by giving you the benefit of the doubt because I'm more willing to believe that you read it but are just naive. They didn't win on freedom of speech grounds, they won on emotional distress grounds. Your son dies and some old fucker whose life is so boring that he finds time, at his age, to go fuck with people at their family funeral, makes a circus out of the funeral. If you don't think that's emotional distress please invite me next time you visit one of your relatives' grave so I can come along and calmly talk to you about how said relative had it coming and the world is a better place now. I won't even bring a sign. Read up dumbass. 
No kidding, it would be a few million pounds of TNT and a six pack for every pilot once back on the ground (assuming pilots are needed).  The US wouldn't loose a man even if a few of them actually flew across the borders. Heck, I bet 12 pilots could push Iran back 100 years.
guide to camera lenses from a photographer.  
No, really, what would be poetic justice would be for her to suffer for years (oh, say, equal to her term in office) with some debilitating level of pain, but not be able to find a doctor who would prescribe enough painkillers due to fear of prosecution.
Yeah that will fix our trade imblance now that all that oil we import will be $100 a barrell. You're a friggin genius. Smarter than Einstein.
I think you confused it with the [Philosphers song](http://www.adelaide.edu.au/library/guide/hum/philosophy/philos_song.html).
Go over to Newsvine.  Tell them Gwenny sent you. :D
You sound extremely cynical. "The cynic knows the cost of everything but the value of nothing."
Nice article.
Hey, you're the one going along with the guy who said "strike her down."
I like the new system- you don't loose your place when you comment anymore.
with the wrong amount of damages as well. At least this article gets the number wrong in the body, but the other submitted articles all clearly state 10.9 million in damages.
Thanks!
Except for the fact that he's slightly insane and already messed up Arkansas enough during his term as governor.
Protest their funeral?  Fuck that, I'd just bring a keg and we'd have a grand old time!
I barely get any work done as it is.  Damn.
I contribute enough taxes to pay for the box of Twinkies the pilots had on the plane.
How does them cutting rates stave off foreclosures? Because now the price of oil, gas, energy, and food are going up so that leaves less money to pay the mortgage?
I'll give you the benefit of the doubt, and assume you're genuinely that daft instead of just playing at it: Buffett's point was that the taxation system needs reform, which his personal overpayment wouldn't achieve or even help.
wow if they played that or publicized that in any meaningful way nowadays people would trip bye bye corporations bye bye pollution and poverty hello world peace
This is right, action movies suck these days. Seriously name a good one from the last few years or so.
ipod,contest,winner,video,nano,success
Dear Mac People:  Where is your (virus-free) "God" now?!?!?!?!?!
It's a bit dated, but still an interesting read-- thanks for bringing this back to my attention, I had forgotten about this.
In Canada, being a member of a party and voting for its leader gives you a lot more say than voting in the election, where you only get to vote for your representative.
me too! http://photos-358.ll.facebook.com/photos-ll-sctm/v157/50/93/22407358/n22407358_35033684_174.jpg
Arguable, though not by me (not enough knowledge). Note http://www.takimag.com/site/article/hitler_and_the_new_nazi_religion/
Would it be fair to say that "functional reactive programming" is the functional world's version of Tell, Don't Ask?
So you're cool with hitting women (if she lies)?  And you may have gender issues.
The information encoded in the list order is redundant either way—but it would be cool if the list were sorted by something that couldn't be derived from the spelling/color/size of the labels. Maybe sort them by how recently they were updated—that’ll usually be *similar* to sorting by popularity, but with a little visual variety thrown in along with some useful extra info.
&gt; They didn't win on freedom of speech grounds, they won on emotional distress grounds.   They won because emotional distress trumped  freedom of speech.  This worries me. What if some poor politicians decide they are offended by in-your-face accusations of, um, all the stuff they do? 
The price of Gold is rising because people know there's going to be an economic crash soon, and gold will be the only thing they have that's worth anything.  Soon our money will either be worthless, or the government will do a depression.
When I read it the first thing I thought was: "Oh God, I hope not!"
Me and my 9 roommates did Legends of the Hidden Temple
there is disturbing the peace. I don't think WSB can be said to be doing this, but a guy with a megaphone is certainly.
Wow. So they finally upgraded to Vista, eh?
as has been pointed out on digg (yes, I read both...) the story was first posted on cnn when only the 2.9 had been stated.  I assume the OP submitted this story before the other 8 million was announced.
When did I say you were a chick (though I was confused).  i stand by original post.
did you watch the video? the merits of his video are high. he gives a good presentation and makes a good point.
Pretty much everything involving applications using modern user interfaces.
&gt; Any reply which does not cite hard, factual numbers is worthless.  "You can prove anything with statistics"
If anyone knows how to get a guy off it's this hottie!
&gt;This will probably be unpopular, so hopefully a few sane people read before the downmods pile on. One thing I find interesting is how I can totally disagree with someone on one thread ($10,000 Sprint Phone Bill) and totally agree with them on the next.  It totally screws up my "us vs them" view of the world.  ;-) And then there's Whiskey Tango...
What math is telling you that it's only an additional 3%?
Oh, sorry, "As a prostitute-using, crossdressing gay man, I think marriage between gays should be illegal because..."
He can beg as much as he wants, but if he still goes with "my brother got me drunk" and doesn't say anything about purposely placing his party next to a strip club in the first place, that's still not an apology.  He's unwilling to take any responsibility and tell the truth.  That's not an apology, it's just crying for his binky back.
I was about to find this funny, but then I realised that it did not cite 'hard, actual numbers'.
Yes, but then you have folks like me with positive karma, yet my post never made it to the New page at all. I checked!
Buy some gold.  That way when we get to our runaway inflation, you'll have something that's still got value.  Only gold and silver keep their value in an economic crash.
Let me guess, scientific authority?
no it was sarcasm. What kind of fundies do you have down there? Is reading the bible not allowed on reddit?  Ill pray you can detect sarcasm better though ;) ..and that the fundies will be dealt with swiftly and harshly.
but who the hell hires these people to represent them in court?  Where do they make their law-money?  I wouldn't care how good of lawyers they are, I couldn't live with myself if these douchebags represented me.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FRdk_exMkY0
I'd love to pay $30 on my 100k. :D
not very eloquent, but I agree.
No, they don't have that right.  Speech that causes harm - HARM, not simply hurt feelings - is not protected under the First Amendment.  This is why you're not allowed to yell "FIRE!" in a crowded theater.
It's the five year old bastard son of Vista and  ME's incestuous relationship.
You're making a very poor and unfortunately common "I would therefore they should" argument.  It just doesn't follow.
The way I read the story, their crimes were... 1. trespassing, and... 2. causing emotional distress. I agree that trespassing could be fined, although not with $2.9M. I disagree that causing emotional distress should. You seem not to, which I find emotionally distressing:) &gt;Maybe because that's less "emotionally distressing"? To the family members of someone who has just been executed, seeing people cheer and carry posters is probably exactly the same.   
Not even close. The rate for 2007 is running around 2.5%, historically an excellent rate. For comparison, under Jimmy Carter it was 13.58%. The Bush admin has actually been very good for the economy. Lousy for war and foreign policy, but unemployment, inflation, and interest rates have been excellent under Bush.
Of course the billionaire who drives a $35k Buick and donates 85% of his wealth to Charity is a "blowhard." What nerves you have.
That's because he invests his money. People who earn a lot of money at a job still pay high taxes. 
&gt;The right to free speech does not equate to the right to be a tremendous dickwad. Yes, in fact, it does.  That is the whole point.  If you want to ensure that your speech will always be tolerated, you have to tolerate other people's uncomfortable, and even offensive, speech.
Where the fuck do all these internet laws come from. Fuck off Godwin, Poe and whoever the fuck else there think their name is good enough to append to some lame ass law.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FRdk_exMkY0
no, just assholes.
he wasn't saying they won because of freedom of speech, he was saying the US population just lost their freedom of speech.  Clearly if you don't believe this is a lose of freedom of speech, its an example of where the US is headed. Read the Constitution and you'll see a bunch of words, I suppose they don't mean a lot to you, but the US was founded upon those words. Not until recently has it been in so much danger and you don't yet realize that it is in danger.  I suppose you'll wake up fast when they come for you. You'll then look around and wonder why nobody noticed anything wrong before. You're in a stupor, WAKE UP!
So, Aerik goes on record saying if his fiancee was looking at a male stripper he's thinks it's all right to wing an ashtray at her head.  Hmmm..
yeah, initial vomiting is a problem with many hallucinogens.
I think they do have a legal right to continue their protests. That said, I'm surprised that none of them have been killed yet. The Westboro "clowns" are throwing sparks at a powder keg of people in emotional turmoil.
Wow that dudes life is basically fucked now.  Half a million bail, his picture on the front page. A short series of very baaad choices. Is there no such thing as bad publicity?
I think you're overlooking the fact that there is no causal connection between living in Detroit and being gay.  However, I think there is a causal connection between being gay and pursuing an anti-gay agenda.
Any DB2 users here care to share thoughts on what makes it your platform of choice?  I've never done anything beyond cursory tinkering with DB2, but I was impressed with what I saw of it.
&gt; Both of these are good things and will do nothing but BOOST American economic growth.  You are correct, but this will be done by devaluing the capital. It is a dangerous game to play.  &gt; America will finally be on a track to net productivity versus net expenditure. The lower rates will cushion any liquidity crisis the recent debt turmoil may stir up,  This is true. It is great for those borrowing money.  &gt; correlated (or weakening) Asian currencies like the yuan and yen will buoy American consumer buying power - just in time for Christmas.  They are weakening because those countries have invested into US bonds. With lower rates, this is a bad idea. They will probably start dumping them, causing a drop in the price. Their currencies will be stronger than ours, and since most goods are now Chinese made, the buying power will drop. The drop in unemployment will not be adequate to counteract the sustained loss of capital.  &gt; And speaking of China - guess what lower interest rates and low currency exchange values have done for them? Double digit GDP growth.  Keeping their people artificially poor, that is what. An average worker in China should have been able to get double the value out of their salaries ten years ago.  &gt; Here in America we have gotten so accustomed to debt financing a strong currency that idiots like you think it's a BAD thing when our currency finalls falls in the midst of strong growth and low interest rates. Absolutely unbelievable.  The sad part is that we have currency that is backed by what effectively are tax futures of unspecified maturity and slowly declining value. It is a risky thing, as a bank run on the currency is rather easy to trigger.  And yes, it is bad if you are holding the actual bills, although that usually encourages investment, in the case of a potential recession, that encourages hoarding of precious metals, which only worsens the economy.  &gt; What would you have bought with your oh-so-strong dollar, anyway? A new BMW?  I buy what I choose. I do not like my savings devalued at such a high rate.  &gt; How about you sacrifice your shiny purchase, invest your money, and help America become strong again? This is the way the game is played.  Bullshit. America is a country that runs on individuality. I will sacrifice my life to preserve the freedoms that this country protects, if I have to. But I will not give money, so that bad management by the government will get a free ride. If there is a tax loophole, I take it. If preserving my earnings means screwing the country financially, well that is too bad. Let the Europeans donate their lives to the greater common good, but I work for myself. You know, at one point, America had a system, where if everyone worked hard for themselves, the country profited.  &gt; The sky is not falling.  It is not falling. Yet. But it may, if the cut the rates just a bit more.  &gt; This is how the global system works.  It is a miracle it worked at all for as long as it does. You know ponzi schemes work too...for a while.  &gt;Central banking exists to react quickly and stimulate growth in all circumstances.  Yes. And ponzi scheme masterminds exist to react quickly to stimulate growth of the pyramid so it does not immediately collapse as well.  &gt;If you don't like it, you can go live in the fucking woods.  I do not like it, and I do not want to live in the woods. I think I will move my money into stocks, as much as I can. I think human productivity and ingenuity is a much better investment than tax futures.
I can also see where music can become less national and more local. More local bands and fewer really big acts.  My son plays in a band, they make a halfway decent amount of money, record and sell their own CDs, play in clubs throughout the south, and have a following. No major label is interested in them ("Interesting sound, but I don't hear a  hit.") -- and yet they keep playing and they love what they do.  They don't have to become hugely famous to justify their existence. As far as I'm concerned, they're successful. They play music for money and don't work day jobs. Who cares if "no one" has heard of them?
Are they saying that fact that Gorbachev was reading about it implies that he must have been involved?  That's quite a stretch.  It seems to be very important to Russia/U.K. politics, so I'd expect him to read about it from many sources whether he was involved or not.
Interpol has superadvanced unphotoshop skillz.
Oh my gad... I would have thought you'd at least not choose a naughty picture file to use as a test!
&gt;I suspect a biased judge.  That is the big secret folks.  The Judge plays a HUGE role in how the case turns out.  You would like to believe that each side presents their case and a jury decides the case.  But the truth is that the Judge gets a huge say in WHAT THE JURY HEARS and what the Jury is told to do... It would scare most people half-to-death to learn what really goes on in a trial first-hand.
Uh... they'd always said the CD would eventually be available in stores. This story doesn't indicate whether the free download will remain available, and I wouldn't be surprised if it did.
"Bombshell" is usually reserved for things that are surprising.
Would it work if there were *OVER NINE THOUSAAAND* suns?
&gt; how does that even make SENSE?!  Is does if you want to stop negative pubicity and don't give a crap about morality.
Oh, I would have sympathized if she'd walked out on the relationship at that point (overkill for most people, but perhaps not for her, given how seriously she took it).   But she didn't, and I have a suspicion--not knowing her, but having known people who resemble this story--that as well as her immediate anger, on some deeper level she frequently relishes that event, because of the power she has in the relationship by always holding it over him, in that it proves that he's bad and should give in to her decisions/do other things to constantly make it up to her.
I actually browse the "new" section, instead of the hot section. I like the variety and the constant changes. Some stories are crap, but others are worth a quick look.  I don't like that the top stories don't change for a whole day. It's very un-web2.0, i.e., you'd think that the crowd is voting more stories to the top.
The only reason our economy looks good right now is because of how much money we have pumped into the Military-Industrial Complex. If there weren't a war the economy wouldn't look so great. Or perhaps it would. That depends on what you think the root cause of all this is.  Edit: Another reason for the historically excellent numbers is the fact that the Fed isn't reporting M3 anymore. That's where most of the money is. So we really don't know what the real inflation rate is do we?
Wow, look at the pair of Galaxies on that one.  Stunning.
his campaigned _wide_ stance?
Rich dude with food points out he has food and starving people don't. Takes no action.
Well, it *is* Halloween, after all!
A brainless tart, exploited by a tribe of parasites for her fertility, who contributed little to the world but wore a lot of posh dresses for charity. Don't miss her a bit.
Yeah - but Clear Channel keeps the proletariat   in line. You, my friend, are bourgeois (as am I, though I have XM!)
i think you mean, meets the worms.
&gt;You dont hit back, thats "tit for tat" domestic violence, thats "one up" payback DV. That wont put an end to DV, it will only change the method, she still has issues that needs to be resolved. Except that according to his post, it *did* put an end to the DV?  Granted she's now doing it to someone else, but I expect that's unavoidable.
Limbaugh was right: there goes that Liberal Media!! No anti-war songs? Wait a minute! Something tells me the liberal media may not be so liberal!! 
I'm just impressed Fox is even reporting this.
I'm not going to go back and rewatch it, but when the subtitles said he mentioned something about the samurai cutting the guards down he was actually saying, "... no tenía claro" or "I was confused," and he never mentioned guards or cutting them.  The rest of it seemed fine though.  Disclaimer: I'm a Korean studying Chinese and Japanese with just a scant few years of high-school Spanish under my belt.  Western languages aren't really my thing.
where's she hiding the wii-mote?
Oh yeah, very believable that someone would give CNN a script to read on the air that describes buildings falling down that are still standing and 5 years later, nobody spills the beans. Everyone knows CNN loves Bushy and would gladly help him cover up the murder of 2000 people.
"Attractor Beam? Are they trying to make the klingons horny?!"
I guess everyone did...the large white object to the left of the Towers of W.S. Babel might be a goatse. 
If you actually believe this, then wow.  I'm honestly extremely concerned.  America - where speech is free, so long as it doesn't offend anyone.
Cuba doesn't have any gas like Burma.  It's a shame though. The island was a really cool place before Castro.
what are those red things that he uses for the string and what is that helmet originally from?  I may try this next year.
Gold is rising because of inflation. 
The difference here is that this is hate speech.
so as an australian i should not expect americas assistance if we are attacked. rather expect an " i,m alright jack " attitude ? is that what this author is suggesting ?
that means you got a $5000 album for free. SCoRE!
Physical force stands behind every injunction of government.  Why do you suppose Phelps feels compelled to pay these millions?  Certainly not out of respect for the court. It is out of the fear that he could be punished.  I was using the phrase 'barrel of a gun' figuratively, to refer to the power which the state commands.  I had hoped that this metaphorical usage would have become clear in the following sentence, when I referred to "the tools of power."  I would have thought that, by now, everyone would had heard and understood the maxim of Voltaire ("I despise what you say, but I would give my life to defend your right to say it"), but I suppose that's not the case.  You ask: "Are you really going to argue in favor of spreading hatred?  Seriously?"  No.  I am not in favor of spreading hatred.  I am in favor of granting people the freedom to speak words of hatred, words I find deplorable, words I would never imagine speaking myself.  As we all ought to have learned long ago, from Voltaire, from John Stuart Mill, from Thomas Paine: allowing someone to speak - indeed, fighting for their right to speak - is not an endorsement of what they have to say. This is the basic presupposition of any free and open society, and it pains me to see you throw it away so frivolously.  Over someone as worthless and marginal as Fred Phelps.
Here's how I use reddit these days.  If the link looks interesting, I'll follow it, and if it is indeed good, I'll up-vote it.  If I don't read the commentary now, and I might later I leave it there, otherwise I'll hide it.  The really great links I'll save, of course.  If the link actually is or appears to be stupid (yet another picture, comic, etc.) I'll down-vote it.  It disappears.  If I think the link might be interesting to others, but I'm not going to read it, I'll just hide it.  I'm not really making a judgement on it.  So every time I come back, I get a new front page.
&gt; Are they there to encourage hate speech? Or are they there to ensure that the government never has the opportunity to silence dissenters? By framing the question as if those are the only two choices, you are gaming the poll. The reason we protect freedom of expression is so that everyone has an equal chance to make their case.  Others can choose to ignore it if they want, but when they choose to SILENCE it - that is where the problems begin. Even in a case like this, where the WBC seems so clearly wrong and asinine, SILENCING THEM sets a precedent to silence someone else who "arguably" is saying something patently offensive. I'm sure that there are a dozen posts a minute here on reddit about Cheney or Bush that MANY AMERICANS would feel were borderline treason.  What if someone got around to taking everyone who made those comments to court? The better alternative is to allow uncomfortable free speech and ignore it.  I didn't hear this trial, and I don't know how they arrived at the violation of privacy - but I'm pretty sure that I wouldn't have found for the plaintiff in this case.  I just place too high a value on free speech.  I think it is worth suffering some in order to protect it.
I upmodded you because it's a well thought out and understandable sentiment, but I disagree.  I think some things and some places should be "sacred", and funerals/cemeteries should be one of them.  I have just as much of a right to grieve in peace as you do to protest.
&gt; Western languages aren't really my thing.  Except, apparently, for English, which might I add seems very refined.  edit: except &gt; expect
Yes, so very sad that companies are looking for the best way to pay back their investment in research and still turn a profit.  How dare they want to make money off an opprotunity.  Disgusting really, that in this high-minded world people still want to make money from their hard work.
In the race to submit articles and be popular, most people think they know what's up before they read all of the details.
just add soap?
What are you are basing this on? There are no details in the article.  Or are you just fighting the man regardless of the circumstances?
Uh, make that 20%.
Nevermind, you clearly can't make the distinction between a *form* and *source* of energy.
Mike Huckabee is the only conservative candidate for President.  Vote.
The victim in this case was a US Marine who by definition, fought to uphold the right of those lunatics to keep inbreeding and spewing bile. It probably will get overturned and tragically, there will be no post mortem justice for the phelps toolbag.  Hopefully they get theirs some day while they're still alive. 
FTFA: &gt;Only the email addresses were exposed; none of the names or other identifying information of the whistleblowers was revealed.  Don't panic, people.  Only their email addresses were given by accident, not their personal information.
Calling someone an idiot is free speech, although it causes emotional harm.  They really arent saying anything that literally hurts someone...
http://pastebin.com/f294bd812  My solution in python. Almost identical to his,  which is most likely because I read his first :p  I'm interested in doing some other programming challanges like this though. Anyone know of any good sites with these types of questions?
Smiling?  Really?  I knew it!  They're IRL trolls!
&gt;you can sue anyone for anything True. &gt;the great thing about america is that Not true.
too bad they included a reputation tarnishing pic  http://i.l.cnn.net/money/2007/10/30/magazines/fortune/Oil_from_stone.fortune/harold_vinegar.03.jpg
I always thought the whole world had gone crazy. Now I know it has.
wealth isn't a zero-sum game, wealthy people aren't stealing it from you, they are making it from where there was no wealth before...
this is the culture of dhimmitude that has got england into the situation it is in today.
If I understand it correctly, the guy was pretty drunk and not fully aware of his actions (which surprisingly happens when you drink alcohol), so he didn't fully understand what he was doing nor was there intent to go to one in the first place.
Towlie from South Park.  http://www.collegehumor.com/picture:1785469
&gt;I'm all for free speech and the right to protest but I would end up in jail if I ever came across these idiots. Then it doesn't really sound like your "all for" free speech.
...or would that be you? (and everyone who voted you up)
Welcome to the world. Any bullshit, no matter how ridiculous, will be believed by someone, somewhere.
What this sub-thread has been about is the assumption, by tendrlls, that infidelity in a declared monogamous relationship should be allowed for men, and therefore her reaction is insane and lazily he defaults to calling her a bitch.  This is a separate issue from whether or not throwing an ashtray as a reaction to any offense is reasonable, even if dealt with simultaneously.  What I have been pointing out is the error in people's framing of her reaction solely in the context of "it's 'just' a stripclub" and she's making a big deal out of something all guys supposedly naturally do and it should be ok to lie about it.  What I said is that if I were in a monogomous relationship and my partner did the same thing this guy did, even if it was my wife, it would still make no difference to me that he/she was "begging over and over for forgiveness," so long as he/she refused to be honest about whether or not he/she was at fault and did not take responsibility.  Strawman, barc0001, ezkiel
Not being hidden doesn't make it well known.
Hillary Clinton is the worst form of a politician, riding the coattails of her husband without ackowledging the huge effect Bill Clinton has had on her poll numbers. Without Bill Clinton the senator would be a literally unthinkable candidate for president nominee and senator. 
Oh man...I read the title as "miniature tractor team."  I thought that maybe in some MIT back room there were whole groups working on miniature farms and farming equipment.  And that when they were done making the equipment?  They would race them. Moving tiny particles with light...what a disappointment.
BOOOOOO!
Fake.  My Russian isn't what it used to be but even I can tell the message doesn't say anything about treason. It sounds more like, "Murder of Litvienko. The suspect could be given up for $7,000"  Whats-his-name is lucky the UK couldn't come up with $7K.
Thats is just plain scary. (From an old school AD&amp;Der.)
Based on what you've said in this thread, you're coming across as a scary guy, and not the good kind of scary either.   You're right that what he did was a breach of trust (although you seem to be comparing it to cheating on her, which is at odds with how most people in western cultures would view it).  She could have walked out at that point and been--at worse--judged uptight; but her response would have been within the realm of "appropriate" (moreso than his going there in the first place). But it's everything you think is a natural and acceptable consequence of the man's fuckup, the way you justify any intentional and direct harm she wanted to inflict in response, that's profoundly disturbing.  If you're not putting us on, then you must have some deeply troubled relationships behind you, given the attitudes you bring into them.
maybe he stuck to run-walking cuz he runs like a girl? *Disclaimer: this comment was not intended to offend any female redditors.  Offer only valid in 49 states.  Void where prohibited.
No. There's a difference between free speech, and "I'm going to fuck with the parents of a dead US soldier for reasons COMPLETELY unrelated to him or his family." It is free speech to say the things they said on their website, in a public forum, etc. A funeral is a PRIVATE affair, and so it is very much the family's right to exclude those they find antagonistic, and press charges if they don't GTFO.
what kind of thing.
No.
I'm not too keen on the idea of marriage, but I do agree with these statements:  "People don't get married because they are in love. They get married to start a family."   I think the whole "Until death do you part" clause in the marriage sermon seems pretty serious, and it doesn't sound like "Until it doesn't work out." Having a stable family with two parents is the only reason I would sign up for such a lifetime contract.  Don't get me wrong. I'm not an anti-divorce troglodyte. Being in a divorced family, I know that two unhappy people shouldn't live together. However, I vowed to myself to do whatever it takes to avoid that situation at all cost. Divorce is forgivable, but it still hurts.
oops, responded wrong place.  Retyping...  Read above, ezkiel.  you're strawmanning me and it's sad.
Heres another little thing thats been in the news around Kansas before.  http://www.religionnewsblog.com/14189/westboro-baptist-church-three-phelps-children-are-on-states-payroll  His daughter works for the Department of Corrections.  AKA the jail.  There are gay people in jail.  Seems like a bad situation for someone to have this much hate of gays to be working in a jail.
Instead of raising his tax rate to 33% lower the max tax rate to 18%.
to shed some light... the *comment deleted* mentioned John Mayer and Hendrix in the same sentence. even though it was a way of expressing what John Mayer is not, seeing those names next to one other seemed like desecration.   
Emotional distress cases are extremely hard to win because they're so prone to abuse. It's not enough for you to go in court and tell the judge that you felt "really really bad" and couldn't sleep that night. Remember, as the accuser, you have the burden of proof. If you go into court with a therapist to testify that you suffered from Post Traumatic Stress Disorder and needed pills, and your immediate future (work, sex life, whatever) was adversely affected by someone's actions, you might just be able to sway the jury. Having said this, your fears are unfounded.   Politicians are the worst example you could pick. Their jobs require them to answer to the public so it's highly unlikely that a claim of emotional distress by a politician will hold any water in court. Think. 
When your knee-jerk reaction was to call me a vapid cunt, duh.  And you asked me why my SO is a pushover, which considering the anti-female sexism you're going with, implies that my SO is a male.  The combination of your reactions being intended for what you thought was a woman.
Shhhhh!! If word gets out about this dollar scam......Oops...too late.
It is the "carried interest", not dividends, that has been of debate. 
I was not trying to denigrate gay people at all, but gay rights have moved forward a long way.  As I was growing up in the '80s, it was still something to joke about, and I was one of the few friends of a kid who got his butt kicked regularly because he came out of the closet.  During the era when the lumberjack song was broadcast (1969), homosexuality was considered much less socially acceptable.  It was just after the Stonewall riots. The LGBT movement  was just getting started. As an '80s kid, I looked at it as a silly song, absurd, and funny.  In '69, I imagine it was pretty daring.  Does someone who is a teenager now will view it and wonder why they made fun of homosexuals on television?  Do they find it offensive?
I think you may have it exactly. Looking for some stuff on functional reactive programming (which is what Tell, Don't Ask made me think of), I found [DataDriven programming](http://haskell.org/haskellwiki/DataDriven). Looking closer, I saw that the Event type was nothing more than a specialization of the continuation.
Flawed research. Firstly, 64 men is a small sample. Secondly, their extreme reaction may have been due to strong emotions other than attraction - eg hatred. I actually have personal experience with a massively conservative gay-hater who happened to be secretly gay, but I really don't believe it's the norm, and I don't think this study proves it.
There are 2 rules in my house that strip clubs would fall under: no exchange of bodily fluids with anyone but eachother (blood donations to the red-cross excluded), and any purchases above $100 must be a joint decision. I'd be pissed if my husband lied, but I probably wouldn't trap him into the lie to begin with: you're gonna be in the vicinity of a strip club, just remember the rules.  
Uh... because she's an insane harpy that gets off in keeping his Whipped Man down? Because of the shame and humiliation of calling off the wedding at the last minute? In the end, the bitch is certifiably Crazy so it would be hard to pinpoint the logic in her actions.
http://w3schools.com is good. They have nice explanations, a solid reference, and the TryIt editor, which is spiffy.  Oh, and use CSS, not tables, for design (unless CSS is a real pain for the specific layout, in which case you should use tables sparingly).
He's the one with the good sense not to pick on people smaller than him, unless they hit him first.  Equivalently, she's the moron who picked a fight with someone twice her size.
its hard though to make a conversation with more than one person. If someone replies inparallel with a point I was going to make, I never see it and the parent commenter is forced to answer the same thing to every other commenter.  Before you used to have a more broad look at whatever branch you were discussing. Now its like it breaks people off into separate rooms almost.
&gt; was both too low level and slow (unbelievable, but true)  I believe it.  For I have seen Brainfuck.
i.... i got a chill reading that.  i.... i hope that isn't true, or, uh i...
ask your fellow jewish people who live and work in iran - i heard they pretty much would love to stay where they are.   so next time when you say iran will... BOOOH! - got ya! i am sure you just crapped your pants.
Howard Dean was never eleactable in the general election. He spent too much time bashing Republicans in general. You can't do that in a primary and then ask for their vote in the general election. They hate you by then.  Hillary is smart to play the middle of the road, because she needs both sides to win.  She realizes that recent candidates, in order to win the primary, have made it impossible to appeal to the wider electorate.
One by one.....waking up ....approaching critical mass.  http://killtown.911review.org/911smokingguns.html  http://patriotsquestion911.com/
How did he mess up Arkansas?
No my lack of doubt is certainty. I am certain that no matter what happens to Paul in regards to blowback, it was not his campaign doing this.
This is too much. The headline is bogus and plehu is a liar. Smart though, he knows Redditors will vote up an "anti-war" headline without actually reading the story.  First of all, the new Springsteen album isn't "filled" with Iraq war criticism. Only one song has a political theme.  Secondly, the words Iraq and/or war don't even appear in the article referenced here.  Springsteen isn't getting played because he is old. That's not right, because he is my favorite artist -- but there's no point in lying about why he's not getting played.  Congratulations plehu. You got an article on page one -- but you made a whore of yourself to get there.
Better be careful, that sounds like something you could be sued for saying now.  It seems like you are meaning to inflict emotional distress.  I'm just saying...
i'm sad, too.
In related news, children with poor parents should starve since their parents didn't earn the right for their kids to eat. Hell, if you want to take it farther, children with rich parents should starve since the children themselves didn't earn the right to eat. And let's talk health care. Kids with broken arms and poor parents? Fuck 'em!  On a more serious note, sure waste and bureaucracy are bad, but comparison of American health care to that of other industrialized countries proves that capitalism can be even more wasteful and bureaucratic. More importantly, having some aspects of socialism results in less suffering and death. Of course it is slightly less "free" since some money must be collected to fund it. But a few thousand dollars a year is nothing compared to the freedoms that have been abandoned due to the fear of terrorism in the last few years. Not to mention the fact that the current administration is plunging the country into debt to kill Arabs by hiring private corporations (owned by its friends) on no-bid contracts at ridiculous markup.  And you bitch about *socialism*? Get a grip.
I'm not sure why you're being downmodded.  The fact that this so called "church" can slander the name of a fallen Marine and posit political viewpoints is absurd.  As long as they are a tax free organization, they don't get a political opinion.  Separation of church and state.  If you want to use the pulpit to preach political philosophy then you need to pay taxes like the rest of us.  Isn't anyone else sick of the mental enslavement that religion holds over its followers?  
"I'm sure this decision won't haunt you forever" Lance Armstrong's words have never rung so true.
Marines do guard nuclear weapons, for example,  the one in Tennessee.
Nah, RoR sucks for anyone not doing enterprisey stuff. It's HUGE, and every project you make needs a new RoR copy. I suggest you just go bare with Python (mod_python/mod_wsgi) or Ruby (whatever ruby uses) and forget about frameworks. Oh, and stay away from C++ CGI if you know what's good for you.
Violence IS violence. It shouldn't matter who is perpetrating the violence. I cannot stand women who think they can get away with hitting ANYONE because they are female. It IS something to get hugely upset about! It's an unfair double standard and should not be condoned. Violence should never be the answer. But if Person A is willing to use violence, they should bear in mind that they have thus given Person B every right to use violence as well. 
I downmodded you for your very mention of the downmod.
there was 2.9 in compensatory, 8 punitive.  
Can you really beat the christ out of a man?
"the state of israel".
I miss the old Reddit a lot.  Fortunately, there's still a group of us biding our time, waiting for the day when Paul Graham and Ron Paul have a caged deathmatch, our glorious leader Paul will be victorious, and the front page will once again floweth with wonderful stories about Lisp and the items on Paul Graham's breakfast menu.
They were the musical guest. Tom Cruise was the first guest.
you forgot inflation in your list of what a declining dollar has of impacts:  There are three types   1. Demand-pull inflation: inflation caused by increases in aggregate demand due to increased private and government spending, etc. - will surely happen according to your point 1  2. Cost-push inflation: presently termed "supply shock inflation," caused by drops in aggregate supply due to increased prices of inputs, for example. Take for instance an increase in imported raw materials. Producers for whom raw materials is a part of their costs could then pass this on to consumers in the form of increased prices. This will obviously happen, since a lower dollar increases prices of imports.  3. Built-in inflation: induced by adaptive expectations, often linked to the "price/wage spiral" because it involves workers trying to keep their wages up (gross wages have to increase above the CPI rate to net to CPI after-tax) with prices and then employers passing higher costs on to consumers as higher prices as part of a "vicious circle." Built-in inflation reflects events in the past, and so might be seen as hangover inflation.   And inflation ain't good bro....
The woman who described herself as a feminist in her craigslist personal ad.  Seems pretty obvious.  Edit: I'll just go with IConrad's response.  It was far more intelligent than mine.
Yes. HTML is the only option.
&gt; Now I have no idea what that video was (and frankly dear, I don’t give a damn!) but what struck me is that this would be a really efficient way to remove your competitions videos from youtube.  Sounds like tomorrow's lewrockwell exclusive. 
hu thx! Now I wont edit my post so that others can understand your comment on mod it up :P
Like the article said, it is a good way to get rid of your competitions promotional videos online. As well as just discredit him completely.
But it states in the article. You're suggesting that the submitter never even read the article itself!  I suppose there might be a reason for someone to race around looking for duplicate articles of this story, I just can't think of any.
Who defines hate speech?
Shakers. That's where it's at. 
I stand corrected.
you are living proof men can be cunts too.  edit: also your SO is probably a pushover if she's cool with you throwing ashtrays at her when she lies.
Wasn't there a $250 price limit, or something? I assumed what he said was a joke. 
They weren't married yet.  And let's not forget the domestic assault part.
&gt;Mainstream media is a problem. Then we are in general agreement. &gt;But I hardly consider NYTimes, Economist, BBC, NPR Mainstream media. This is where we start to disagree. I have lost my respect for the NYT through its reporting during the lead-up to the Iraq War and its hadling of the Duke rape scandal. I consider the BBC and Economist a few cuts above the NYT, but still within the limitations of the MSM. &gt;And to say that you dont believe it to be true just because the mainstream media agrees with that position it's folly. What if the mainstream media says breathing is good, are you going to stop breathing? That is not what I am saying. I said I distrust the mainstream media. That doesn't mean I will simply become a contrarian based on the media's positions. Instead, it simply means that I will apply critical thinking and common sense to stories circulated within the MSM and do some independent fact-checking on all important issues. &gt;While there maybe better sources of information that will help me understand deeper and better about Global Warming, the time it takes for me to find credible sources of information, clear incentives and motives and who the scientisits is researching for, and then read about their studies, I would have read at least 10 articles not just on Global warming, but also internation domestic affairs. I simply do not have the time to be well informed in all the subjects if it requires me to do my own research. Being well informed requires an investment in time and mental capacity. here are no shortcuts. The mainstream media, particularly in the US, has failed miserably in the past decade. That should be common knowledge to everyone on Reddit. So, why trust the media on global warming?
I don't know how you interpreted that guy's words to mean that the US population just lost their freedom of speech but, "...this is a lose of freedom of speech...," might have something to do with it. My comment had nothing to do with the broader issue of freedom of speech in the US so I'm not even going to address that in my response. Read my response to that guy again because I don't want to cut and paste it as a response to you as well. 
The difference here is that EVEN THE KKK has the decency (as far as I know) not to go protest at the funerals of blacks, jews, and hispanics. WBP can arrange their little marches and protests all they want and you'll never heard me argue.  Stay away from private citizens homes and funerals. for fuck's sake.  
Article didn't say a damn thing about the energy balance of Shell's new super double secret plus good process is, so we really don't know.  Color me skeptical, but I don't believe it until I see more proof other than talk about the supposed dollar price of the resource.  Do you remember Thermal De-Polymerization that was supposed to provide $30/bbl oil from trash and turkey guts?  Wonder how that is doing.
What other rights do they forfeit by not being taxed?
Hmm... near record low unemployment.  Yeah, Bush is doing it.  The real issue is out-of-control consumer spending.
The site's full of idiots, these days. All they do is chant shit about Ron Paul, atheism, cop hatred and Dubya.  Of course things are slowing down. It's turning into a congregating point for dimwitted kids.
In terms of what they've collectively accomplished, yes.  If that's our definition of 'success,' I submit that insects are more successful than Muslims.
So, you just troll Ron Paul stories all day?  How much do paid hacks like you make these days?
Someone is up to no good. 
Yeah. Fine. As long as there are no goddamned commercials in the download. That's the clincher.
They were on a public street during their protests. Are you suggesting a private affair incorporates public space?  Its hard to stand up for freedom sometimes. Unless we stand up now for it, we won't have anyone left to stand up for it when its our turn.
How low did europeans sink to receive this guy with all the honors of a civilized country head? Did you see how quickly he went on to prince Philip. It looked like he spent 1/3 of a second greeting the Queen and as soon as he could he grabbed Philip's hand. Just do there is no misunderstanding, he came here to talk to the MAN right?
While I don't necessarily condone violent retribution, I don't think that was the case here. This is more about standing up to a bully and retaining equality in that particular relationship. In this case, that one act resulted in an end to the aggressive cycle. Should things have gone the other way and the violence escalated, then other options come to mind. But I don't believe that every hurtful comment or action is a trigger for endless counseling. That ALSO places a lot of strain in a marriage (nobody likes to be accused of being The Problem in front of a counsellor).
I like the site's redesign. It's been a long time since I've visited gnu.org so I don't know if this is a recent thing.
Does the fact that Fidel Castro kicked out all the U.S. corporations in 1959 have nothing to do with the current policy?
it doesnt have to be a yes/no answer you could elaborate.  You said yourself: "Yes, I would. Because the reaction to the original offense has nothing really to do with the original offender's refusal to take responsibility for it."  this suggests you would be ok with a man throwing an ashtray at a woman for going to a strip bar.  try not to get so emotional answer my points straight on instead of going for the least relevant part of my statements.
So what you are saying is that if I own a company worth $8M and only pay myself $25k/year (living very frugally) that I should pay more than $4k in taxes? I would have to pay myself more just to cover the taxes then.
correct, total damages being 10.9 and not the 2.9 mentioned in the title.
&gt;I am financially secure and have a plan for myself that is better done without a typical American woman's bullshit to goof it up. I don't hate women at all by the way, I just know what is worth my time and what isn't.   Nice try.  You are sexist, douchebag.  When you have to use a disclaimer just before or after a line you know is a typical invokation of sexism but are unwilling to change it and clarify, you're still a sexist.  &gt;1. I never seriously date a woman who terminated her last relationship because she wasn't "happy". Happiness is an emotional response to external stimuli. To break the vow of "til' death do us part" over an emotional state that may or may not be another person's fault, is shallow and shows a lack of emotional maturity. It tells me that woman is too self absorbed to be a reliable partner in the future.   Oh, you stupid shithead.  When you get married out of love, of course not being happy is a good reason for a divorce.  That's why we have "no fault" divorce.  Divorcing you is not necessarily attacking you.  *you* have some emotional "growing up" to do.  &gt;2. I don't date fat women. Sorry, all you "BBWs"; get a grip on reality. If you are walking around looking like you have a beer keg stuffed in your pants, you don't give a shit about yourself, so I really don't expect you to give a shit about me in the long run. **Don't give me that crap about how happy you are with yourself, you're not and we both know it.** If you and I had fallen in love twenty years ago, gotten married and had a family and you had put on the weight, I would still be with you, but we didn't and so I see no need to accommodate your lack of character and discipline.   (emphasis mine).  Oh, so you have first dibs on what another persons's innermost feelings really are?  Some kind of super-psychic, are you?  &gt;4. Feminists. I don't date women who are avowed feminists with a "you go girl" mentality. Sorry, but your little movement fucked things up in a major way. I think women ought to vote, receive equal pay for equal work etc. etc. I do have enough sense to recognize that whether by design or chance, men and women are different and since I think that form follows function there is a reason for our differences. I don't want to be around a woman who wants to prove to me she is as good as I am at "man" stuff. It is annoying. It makes you look stupid and insecure.   You don't even know what feminism is.  &gt;8. Anyone who is fanatical about much of anything. If you are religious fanatic, I too believe in God. I have a degree in Theology as a matter of fact, but as far as I can tell, God didn't assign any woman at anytime to be my moral gatekeeper. **He did tell you to be "keepers at home",** if you are so caught up in church work that you are making your family the second priority in your life you aren't following your own rule book. I digress, fanaticism of any kind is a psychological addiction and I prefer to spend my time with people who lead a well balanced life. Addiction of any kind is a turn off.   (emphasis mine)  Ah, and finally he gets down to it.  He wants a wife to be a servant, not a person.
It's a metaphor often used for collaborations such as Open Source http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Barn_raising
Helps them go through nuclear winter.
I feel somewhat of a fool for walking into the trap of rebutting the canonical feminist viewpoint, but here goes.  &gt; Why are so many gay people dis proportionally interested in fashion?   First of all, I'm a bit confused with this connection you're posing about gay men. The only connection I can draw the lines with is that gay men somehow are women? What?  &gt;Don't you think that if there were this huge glut of talented female engineers, overlooked because of sexism, that some company would have hired them by now at a reduced rate, gaining a huge advantage?  I find that answer somewhat amusing from a person on Reddit. When the majority of the programming section seem to link towards places which demonstrate Lisp, Haskell, OCaML, etc. in action, and argue that they are the next cash cow, if you believe that this fundamental lack in female hiring is because women are simply not interested, maybe you should use the same logic and assume that functional programming is a flop, and will never make it into the limelight. (And while I do realize I did a good bit of generalization here, if the criticism does not stick on the author himself, at least it should stick upon the modders of the comment).  Also, the feminist perspective is really very easy to understand if you for a second decided to think about it instead of bashing about how it devalues your sense of accomplishment. The default to think of men and women as equal is as much a mental device as anything. By *assuming* this mental device, it is easier to view men and women upon an unbiased scale. By reinforcing that a certain profession has a propensity towards men or women, and therefore is justifiably male-dominated, is to simply create a Catch-22 to funnel out the very minority that you say is not interested. Now in reality, women on the whole may not be interested in a particular profession, but that doesn't mean we should chuck away a perfectly effective mental device.  Lastly, to give an impression of how different the world was before the feminist movement, [look here](http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/8/81/Two%27s_Company%2C_Three%27s_a_Crowd.jpg) . This was meant to be funny, at that time. Yet I'd be hard-pressed to find a modern reader who finds anything funny in the picture. Its a symbol of sorts of how much feminism has changed the global landscape of everything. After two waves or phases of the feminist revolution, to blithely believe that a magic button has been pushed, and that feminism must be stopped, is an argument without proof indeed.  EDIT: Really stupid misread of a link in my argument.
RS-232g has been cracked.
"Emotional distress" is a contentious charge with real free speech implications.  It requires that an act be "outrageous," i.e., beyond civilized decency - so only "civilized" speech is protected.  That gives me the shivers.  There's a practical consideration too.  Keep in mind that these Westboro assholes WANT to be persecuted for their beliefs.  Censorship makes them appear as martyrs, but give them enough rope and they'll quickly hang themselves.  The ACLU has good press releases on these laws.  See [1](http://www.aclu.org/freespeech/protest/24537prs20060309.html), [2](http://www.aclu.org/freespeech/protest/25433prs20060502.html), [3](http://www.aclu.org/freespeech/protest/26265prs20060721.html).
http://patriotsquestion911.com/  http://www.ae911truth.org/
Firstly, how does one differentiate "anarchy" from "democracy" with respect to the concentration of power under both systems?  Is there a meaningful difference between the two?
A false argument. What he chooses to drive and his charities are irrelevant regarding his opinion on tax rates. Tax rates shouldn't spike simply because of an old billionaires guilty delusion that he didn't pay enough through the decades.  Again, if he believes what he says he can always write a check. Then Hillary can fund that Woodstock Museum and Senator Byrd can fund another building or road in West Virginia which he can have named after himself. 
&gt;I think someone is maybe a little discombobulated since the front page has been filled with less left leaning, dare I say "extremist" articles since the new version. At least it seems that way to me.  Get your eyes checked. The front page is still "left leaning".  &gt;especially programming. That is a good thing.  Prgoramming is nothing but a advertising page for Microsoft with an occasional article about haskell or python.
I hate the ACLU but where are they when you need them.
So how much did he have in his wallet?
your link is broken, try this:  http://www.atimes.com/atimes/Southeast_Asia/IK01Ae01.html
http://www.ae911truth.org/  http://911scholars.org/
[The Top 20 Reasons Not to Move to Dubai](http://www.escapeartist.com/efam/94/art_20_Reasons_Not_Move_to_Dubai.html)
  Rich people, like me, (that IS sarcastic) have most of our potential wealth invested in the economy (for me, that IS true), where it builds more wealth (that is debatable, but I believe it).  Part of that wealth building comes back to rich people, like me, but much of it fuels the machine.  The system must encourage invesment.  If it didn't, why would we rich people invest?  When a rich guy, like me, decides to sell stock at a profit, there should be a reward for the risk taken.  That reward is a reduced tax rate.  I didn't get rich by working.  I didn't get rich at all, yet, but you should appreciate the money I've put on the table. 
I wonder if people look back and say "reddit killed lisp once and for all".
point taken insect are more successful and attractive than muslims
Crap and I'm out of tin foil too.
it is very clear what Bush stands for on any given day.  but he was for a "humble foreign policy" and against nation-building before the 2000 election and switched on both after.  he has shifted the rationale for his tax cuts several times.  he was against the department of homeland security and the 9/11 commission before taking credit for them.  he was for reducing government spending until he became the most prolific in history.  when he first ran for congress, he was pro-choice, and then he flipped.  he has flipped on a number of positions.  the problem is that he has been extremely stubborn about certain decisions he has made.  which is different from not flipping positions.
If U.S. taxpayers are forced to share the risk and cost to prop-up the economy, should they demand to share in the benefits of such an economy?
Hmmm, 1.5 billion dollars, how much will that cost to print?  Oh silly me, why waste good paper and ink when you can just add numbers to a computer, thus manipulating election numbers in a computer....   
http://pilotsfor911truth.org/  http://www.journalof911studies.com/
you can't blame bush this time. all he is doing is to serve his employer. that's part of the contract.
un atomic watchdog named Mohamed .... thats reassuring ..... lets hope he is a bit less supportive of violence than his namesake
I've noticed that. 90%* of the new submissions to the programming subreddit exist at 0 points or less.  *May be made up.
I don't.  I merely assumed that was the case due to her wording.   &gt;*I* hate the whole stripper thing, so he *agreed* to a coed party at a dueling piano bar.  Sounds to me like he wanted to go to a strip club, she bitched and moaned until he agreed to go to the piano bar with her(and assumedly, her fat friends).  I could well be wrong.  But I'm not.
&gt;Reddit is a fun site to waste time on, but it's getting to the point where I don't really want to bother reading it at all because of all the emotional immaturity. Man, are you in for a nasty, nasty awakening when you discover The Rest Of The Internet.   Please have a friend handy to take a picture of your face at the moment it happens (like that marvelous flickr group which is entirely "people's faces photographed at the moment they first saw goatse").
Whenever I have a ethical/moral/political/spiritual dilemma, I know The Onion has me covered with all the right answers. 
http://www.journalof911studies.com/  http://stj911.org/
helpful site for garden shed plans
I don't think what you say is true. I think rich people like to live in a place they like, and they will pay a premium to do so. I would expect that a billionaire who wants to live in a particular country will do so, even if it costs him a few millions. Look at the UK. High taxes, high prices, but worth paying for. The USA is much the same. Sure, they could live in Bangladesh and save a heck of a lot of money... but do they really want to? They could live on a tax haven island... and lose all their friends, not be able to go to a football match? It's true that many people will use tax loopholes to get around taxes. However, there isn't an infinite resource of loopholes. A good government is perfectly capable of closing those loopholes.
too much ron paul
IMNSHO: Anyone who wants to kill himself is very welcome to it, too much effort in 'convincing' the person is wasted. If they want to go, the door is WIDE OPEN; leave the world for those who want to live.
You're forgetting the cost of basic necessities (food, shelter, clothing, etc) takes up a much, MUCH lower percentage of the income of the ultra-rich than the income of regular people.  Progressive taxation is based on the concept that the ultra-rich couldn't have possibly earned all of those dollars by that one person's drops of sweat, that it came from wealth generated by others. (Trickle-up for lack of a better term). Basically, the ultra-rich make more money for doing less work. Progressive taxation attempts to even out that imbalance.
don't tase americans, bro.
Perhaps your definition of fidelity differs from theirs. + The groom was not married, but engaged.  + He got a little drunker than maybe he should have, but there as a great deal of pressure because it was a bachelor party.  + He was led by friends, who were also likely drunk to a compromising situation.  + He agreed beforehand that he would not go to the strip club and, presumably, he did not change that decision until after he became intoxicated.
Who suggested we should trust reporters or editors?  If you would like to give up your authority to decide which stories contain 'truth', to whom will you give it?
In the interest of the long term good and in a culture that values judicial precedent; is it possible that ideological positions might be a good thing (especially with something as important as free speech)?
I see where you are coming from, but I learned how to navigate around it, and I am a girl, for Pete's sake.  ;-)  I didn't ask questions which I could devote enough time reading and searching for and find the answer. And seriously, the answers are almost always out there. It is true that there is a learning curve which may be steep at times, but as with any endeavor, the more effort you put into it the more rewarding it is.  More importantly, I don't know your level of knowledge and so wouldn't know where even to begin to explain this to you without going over your head or on the other end, sounding like I am patronizing you. 
In 1954, Congress approved an amendment by Sen. Lyndon Johnson to prohibit 501(c)(3) organizations, which includes charities and churches, from engaging in any political campaign activity. To the extent Congress has revisited the ban over the years, it has in fact strengthened the ban. The most recent change came in 1987 when Congress amended the language to clarify that the prohibition also applies to statements opposing candidates.  http://www.irs.gov/newsroom/article/0,,id=161131,00.html  Churches cannot advocate political bias.  That's the whole basis of their tax exempt status, and yet fundie Bush is happy to overlook that ban. 
In other news, heterosexual men like womens' breasts. 
I didn't say it was an excuse, I said I would forgive him(as would any reasonable person).  Like I said, it was no good to break a promise, however, *she threw a fucking ashtray at him.*
I would probably advocate an equal tax rate, and try to keep it as low as possible.
It seems as though the main thrust of your post is asking me to prove the assertion that "sexual reproduction homogenates genetics".  &gt;&gt;My point is that I think that sexual reproduction homogenates genetics.  &gt;What makes you think that, considering that every successful pairing produces a unique new combination of genes?  Well in my first post/s I put forth the Amish (and inbreeding as a whole) as evidence (if sexual reproduction is just a unique shuffle of genetic data then why does inbreeding cause the narrowing of genetics that allows genetic flaws to be more easily expressed?). For example why does the *"fitness-biased randomization that takes place during sexual reproduction"* that you mentioned not safeguard us from the dangers of inbreeding?  As to proof.. I dont have any. For the longest time I have had the hunch that sexual reproduction results in the offspring having  a slight disadvantage in the long run because they inherit only a subset of the genetic variation of their parents. Maybe I will have to do some simulations or something to test further (and do more research on what exactly  happens with the dna when forming gametes, zygotes etc). 
By allowing her to hit him again and again, he was cooperating with her domestic violence. When he hit back, he changed her behavior. The domestic violence stopped. Tit for tat is a way better strategy than always cooperating (as Robert Axelrod more-or-less proved when he ran the iterated prisoner's dilemma competitions).  I'd say that hitting back was the right thing to do.
Check your rape checklist.  Are women the only persons allowed to claim drunkenness as a defense?
"pretty much sums up the ethical bankruptcy of Muslim politics" [this here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States) sums up pretty much the ethical bankruptcy of "the west"
Yeah, funny funny. I've *created* far more offensive sites than you'll visit in a year.
OK, I'll break your response to him down.  &gt; They didn't win on freedom of speech grounds, they won on emotional distress grounds.  He never claimed they won on freedom of speech. He was supporting the WSB church in saying that they need our support for their freedoms.  Read what the commenter is saying, he is against the judgment. He knows that they won emotional distress grounds. He knows that the distress was caused by the freedom of speech WSB church members were exercising.  &gt; Your son dies and some old fucker whose ... and the world is a better place now.  This is your rational for repealing the first amendment of the federal constitution. It really doesn't matter what the circumstances are, you just want to suppress the people you don't like.  I'm sure you'll claim to be in favor of freedom of speech, but what you (and prez Bush) really mean is you support speech that is favorable to your views and opinions.
the last paragraph is the scariest to me.  Who would even dream of doing that?  "according to one survey last month, 6% of British homeowners have been using their credit cards to pay their mortgages."
I've never seen a non-gamed poll involving Ron Paul. So far every poll that shows him doing well are of the get your friends to press vote as many times as possible variety.  It's sort of like cheating on an exam. You might feel relieved at not failing, but you would be an idiot to think your grade reflected how smart you actually are.  Anyone who isn't already a Ron Paul fanatic is sick and tired of those who are. It's incredibly naive to think the sorts of tactics used by Paul supporters will gain them significant converts. 
So, they can sign the Trojan-horse executable?  The problem is that the installer on the disk image doesn't install an actual codec, and according to [the advisory](http://www.intego.com/news/ism0705.asp), it's an installer *package* (.pkg document) for Apple's own Installer application (which is the Right Way to do installers on Mac OS X) rather than an installer *application* (which you could sign).  An installer package is just a document for Installer, and I don't see anything in the [Code Signing Guide](http://developer.apple.com/documentation/Security/Conceptual/CodeSigningGuide/) that says that a signature of a document would be verified, if a document can be signed at all.
Dude, I've hated more people than I want to admit, and I never got wood over it--unless they were female, naked, and hot, in which case, oh hells yes. Please, will someone else speak up about getting a boner over seeing someone they hated, naked, when that person didn't match the hater's sexual preference?
But on the other hand, I have to say that Reddit is very interested in FORTH.
"The"? There was only ever one woman on all of craigslist who did that? Who's she?
&gt;Given that the late Ordovician suffered an ice age (with associated mass extinction) while atmospheric CO2 levels were more than 4,000ppm higher than those of today (yes, that's a full order of magnitude higher), levels at which current 'guesstimations' of climate sensitivity to atmospheric CO2 suggest every last skerrick of ice should have been melted off the planet, we admit significant scepticism over simplistic claims of small increment in atmospheric CO2 equating to toasted planet. http://ff.org/centers/csspp/library/co2weekly/2005-08-18/dioxide.htm I began to doubt the Global Warming consensus upon researching the relationship between carbon dioxide and temperature levels in past geological eras. Sorry if I sounded condescending, but I was making a point (and wanted to get some sleep).
Here is a great squidoo lens for those who love knitting. Hipster Knitting, it s the place to go! Loved the Scary Knitting video too. :-)
yeah - something is wrong alright. i've monitored the front page all evening and yes there's very little turnover.  the reddit team need to tweak a few dials in their algo.
You are so downmodded.
This is one of three things, but since we cannot actually see the messages to see if a trailer for a viagra ad is attached, we don't know one of them. &gt;The e-mails had phony names attached to real-looking e-mail addresses. When lab researchers examined the IP addresses of the computers from which the messages had been sent, it turned out that they were sprinkled around the globe in countries as far away from each other as South Korea, Japan, the United Kingdom, Nigeria and Brazil.  Typical notorious spam sources.  So, they are either, misguided, but well meaning "supporters", pure scam artists attempting to capitalize on RP success on the Internet (need message for ad verifications) or a effort by a different, potentially well meaning group of other republican campaign "supporters".  Attempting to create some kind of hoax of course.  Does anyone really think that RP legitimate campaign would do this after raising so much money and rising in popularity the way they have? &gt;http://www.cis.uab.edu/forensics/  A search on the site for "ron or paul" in their search engine yields no results. 
Nowhere since I wrote the headline, but I thought I would provide a link to some additional info since obviously no one can look at his book right now.
&gt; Which puts most users back into the "trust your source" camp they're already in, except it takes longer to install software for no good raisin.  It's quite a pickle.
1. one customer sues Dell, alleging one tech support dude is a freak. 2. ?????? 3. Dell (the largest PC maker in the world) now 'extinct'.  Riiiiiight
What are you, an echo?
Yeah? You just repeated what I said in more words. What's your point?
He wasn't unfaithful (He didn't have sex with any strippers as far as the letter says): he made a promise he didn't keep.  Are you more perfect than that?  And holding a grudge against someone who's apologized, and continually bringing it up, and physically abusing him for it, is evil.  If it was a habit of lies, or spending her money, she should just leave him, not abuse him.   
You honestly think, with the woman in the story, that if he had told her "Sorry, hon, I'm going to the titty bar with my friends." that he wouldn't still be getting just as much shit for that?
Laser lasso!
I don't care about what Congress says, I care about *inalienable* rights. The individuals in a church have a right to free assembly, free association, free speech, and they can mix these rights as they wish. I don't care that they're not being taken from because of their association - I care about their rights.  I don't like them either, but taking away the rights of an unpopular minority is exploitative.
thanks for your contribution.
It's effectively slander, and slander is rightly illegal.
Hahaha.  Dude, you should check where most of the clothes, shoes, kitchen appliances, etc come from.
URL in Question: http://news.google.com/?ncl=1122953081&amp;hl=en&amp;topic=n
:)... that did make me smile, btw.
&gt;People get brain damage and die from splitting their skulls on the pavement after a shot like that.   Bill didn't seem to be (intellectually) impacted so much, (he retained idiocy throughout the affair) yet Hillary, who did throw an ash tray at him and did claw his face, is a front runner for the Democratic nomination.
IMO, tag clouds sound great in theory but are awful in practice.
I'll take a look at realclimate. I'll look at the IPCC site as well, but if it focuses on computer modelling, I'll ignore its findings. In my opinion, the history of the earth (as revealed by fossil records and other scientific methods) is a better venue for understanding the impact of carbon dioxide on the climate than computer models (which, as has been pointed out bu scientist and non-scientist alike, are horribly flawed and an improper tool for climate science). Edit: I'll have to disagree with your opinion on Googling. Googling with an open mind and a critical analysis will at least get you to the dry information and analyses the mainstream media ignores. Besides, you are more likely to find reasoned debate online, rather than the sensationalist doom-day scenarios the media prefers to promote.
'Sister &amp; Daughter' - is that two people, or just the one?
question to the powers that be at reddit:  type the number 915 in your "search" box and then tell me why it doesn't display this article. (in fact it says "there are no results here")
Absolutely. There's nothing, and i mean nothing, that will unify the Republican base like an opportunity to vote against a Clinton. Why do you think the Republican talking heads are so interested in implying that she is the shoe-in for the Democratic nomination?  Please, please, please don't let her be nominated. Edwards or Obama will have a much better chance in a national election. 
That's interesting.  Might this also be a reflection of the fact that treating employees like crap costs more in the long term? 
It was (and probably still is) also widely misinterpreted as being jingoistic, at least by people who only knew Springsteen from his singles.  I imagine if more people caught the real meaning of it, Clear Channel wouldn't play it either.
You stated with certainty that it is less than one, I said that it is unknown for Shell's process.  You ==&gt; EROEI &lt; 1  Me  ==&gt; EROEI ??? (the stupid article didn't say a damn thing about it)
&gt; Stay away from private citizens homes and funerals. for fuck's sake.  and political rallies, military facilities, rich people, barber shops and puppies.
&gt; To put it bluntly, there were enough extremely rich people claiming a 0% tax rate to make your stomach turn  They are called retired people. They do not earn money at a fast rate (hence 0 tax) and live off their savings. The savings have already been taxed.
The natural gas situation in Canada is beginning to look bleak. We're past natural gas production peak and the rates of decline in gas fields are typically very rapid. Enjoy your western bonanza for the next five years. It won't last much beyond that.
It's not the new reddit.  It's the political subreddit, and (thankfully!) people using it properly.
cool discovery.
Acceptable clouds:  * Cirrus * Stratus * Cumulus  Unacceptable clouds:  * Cumulonimbus * Tag
To be serious about it, there's nothing ethically *wrong* with this... no one's being harmed. It's just batshit insane and fucking gross.
That was some class A++ inflammatory.
This is like arguing with a 10-year old. I'll let IConrad explain it: &gt;The second-order simulacra woman who uses the terminology the CL poster ... reported as meaning "fat" or "ugly", respectively.
The Marine is dead. Your argument is moot.
Hillary has a shrew like quality about her when she gets in a situation she doesn't like.  Remember that time the guy in Iowa asked her a question she didn't like and she accused him of being a plant?
Upvoted for having a grip that could choke a raging bull on the use of similes.
You can't stop anyone from looking anyhow. But so you know; they do touch some at strip clubs...but really the only objection I have to strip clubs is the waste of money.  But I waste money on things too.  I'd rather not make a habit out of wasting money on those types of things. 
Cocks that are hunting, or hunting for cocks?
Emotional blows can be crippling, but his action wasn't one of those emotional blows, and was not likely done with the specific intent of causing her harm. Her violence could have harmed him severely, and she knew it when she threw it at him.  It's reasonable to believe that she did specifically intend to cause him harm, or at least pain.
I don't get why the fact that they are not republicans is relevant to the fact that they support Ron Paul. But they could be republicans, couldn't they? The whole comment confuses me, I suppose. I guess I am just that slow.
Not forth. Slava.  I highly doubt a noticable percentage of them programs in forth or factor.  Come to think of it proggit follows a cult of personality.
It can still be funny even if it's worthless ... maybe even more so. 
&gt; the system provides about 70% more energy than it consumes  [citation needed]
The ambiguity is what I like
Well, the fed board does have a very short-term time horizon and they care about some things more than others. They view recession to be avoided at all cost; look at the drastic action in response to the mild short one in 2001. On the other hand, they have no qualms about debasing the currency as long as productivity increases keep it from showing up in CPI.   I bought Canadian dollars, gold, and emerging market equities about two months ago. I didn't feel like I was smarter than the Fed board, but I definitely have a different view of the world than they do. So I took advantage of them and I'm doing well. The ironic thing is that if they thought about economics like I do, then my portfolio wouldn't do well at all.
I've never liked them. I'd rather see a straightforward list of the most popular or relevant topics to look at.
Do you deny that it is a possibility?  Do you put it past the republican party?
If Corporations continue to enjoy preferential treatment, having more freedom of speech, more capital, more political influence, and less liability, will such a president matter?
I think this outdoes PERL on indecipherability.
you yanks could blow it up and save a fortune on bullets
It's weird.  You guys find one or two examples of artists who enjoy getting their music stolen and you run with it.  The majority of artists are happy with the agreement the record companies.  Yes, the record company takes most of the profit; but have you guys ever worked a real job?  The employees do all the work and the boss collects all the money.  The service that the record company does for these unknown artists is immeasurable.  
I can't search for this at work (I get the feeling the sysadmins would notice me searching for "gay erection study") but I remember reading that the study didn't really measure arousal directly. It was some effect that can also be caused by other things. PS. I accidentally hit report rather than reply first, so if an overzealous mod deletes your post I apologise - my fault.
If you are exporting more then you are importing then a weak dollar is good. Otherwise it's bad.  A weak dollar works great for china, for the US, not so much.
Ok - why?
I know. I posted it so people could see how fucking ridiculous they are.
Oil sands are a bit better than the shale. They are easier to cook and later refine. The shale stuff is the absolute bottom of the barrel stuff (pun intended).
The ratio tells us who is more powerful.  And if history and common sense are any guide, I think it is unanimous that the bully is always wrong.  If you want a legal explanation of who is wrong, here's one: \[[PDF][]\]  [PDF]: http://anthonydamato.law.northwestern.edu/Adobefiles/israels-borders-under-international-law.pdf
We seem to be talking past each other.  My assertion is: &gt;Sexual reproduction homogenates genetics. Therefore barring some other factor the homogenization of a sexual population will render that population unfit to survive given enough time.  The Amish example (and inbreeding as a whole) seems to me to be evidence of my assertion.  I guess I think that *if* my assertion is true then it would have some impact on the theory of evolution.
Are you getting so worried as to spout such alarmist crap about a country you are not even a citizen of? He must be doing something right!
Can we please perhaps acknowledge that, hearing only the short version of one side of the story, it is entirely possible that "begging for forgiveness" might involve more than just saying "sorry, my brother got me drunk?"
"Believe"... poor word choice.
Wow - it looks like a bouncing ping-pong ball.
and  you sound like a christian
i find them vastly more bearable than the nannying hectoring government socialist propaganda that is the BBC.  and i'm not left-wing.  i think what it is , is that C4 news hasnt dumbed down and treats its audience as if they do have more than one braincell.  you get vastly less of the "the government will announce next week..." or "you will die in a global warming disaster unless you change!!!" kind of crap on C4 News.  its just more factual and more "newsy".
My rights end where yours begin.  Your right to free speech in no way trumps my right to grieve in peace.
It'll be called 'The Amero'.
So it's really 5 suns with one hidden?
After paying, say one million dollars in taxes, hasn't a person paid enough? At what point has a person paid his fair share to the government?  Why do people think it's moral to take away a percentage of a person's income by force just because that person is productive?
As evidence, the plaintiffs presented a vial of tears of a baby. That alone was worth $300,000.
I can't really make out if she actually hit him with the ashtray, or whether he was fast enough to duck.
just maybe it prevented a rape
yeah because they switched the 'hot' to show 'recommended' when you are logged in..  now i have to log out to see the latest stories and log back in to vote.. its getting to be a pain
This is the second time within the past 35 years that our military has been forced to battle a Republican president via the "quiet coup". Just as when Nixon went bonkers, it seems the generals have had to step in once again as Bush and Cheney threaten bussiness as usual. Our hero may never come forward now that the Pentagon won. If Cheney had his way, we'd know all the names for sure. This event was Cheney's downfall. Now Condi and Gates call the shots. Any Iraqi invasion is now off the table since Putin signed on with Iran. We might be able to desteoy Iran's infrastructure within a few hours, but we can't defeat Russia. Congrats to those military brass who hold their allegiance to the Constitution above politics. I find it especially gratifying to hear it was the Air Force that blew the whistle. After reading about the forced Christianization at the Air Force Academy a few years back, I worried that our air corp would prove traitors. I'm so glad to be proven wrong. 
Redact THIS, CIA.
It also lowers our wealth. We buy less with each dollar we have or make in the future.   And don't forget that the reason cheap currency causes economic growth is sticky wages. Real wages go down as prices rise but wages lag behind. As a result businesses hire more workers and produce more, and national income goes up. 
They're kidding, right? That was Jon Stewart humor right? Oh. Not right? Crap.
Usually there is at least 2 output for you to protect your computer and monitor from unexpected power disruption and then there is one USB interface port for you to connect to the computer. Here is how you can use 1 UPS to provide backup power for more than 1 computers and you can shut down all your computers properly when battery level is low.
enter a comment here
Don't get excited. It's just a distribution deal, Radiohead retains all rights.  http://www.billboard.com/bbcom/news/article_display.jsp?vnu_content_id=1003665831
Would the logic of buy low, sell high work here?
I agree: forgive &amp; forget.  But if she chooses not to forgive him, and he chooses to stay with her, I might say that's kinda then his problem then.  (Oh, and forgive &amp; forget only works so many times... fool me once... we won't get fooled again! or something like that.) 
Oh, wow.... look at all those feeds. 
Well, if you want to be pedantic, it's even worse.  Oddly enough, I was just reading about the pluralization of 'Lego' on the [LEGO FAQ](http://www.faqs.org/faqs/LEGO-faq/).  As it turns out, 'LEGO®' (yes, caps) as a noun can only mean the company, one of the pieces is supposed to be called a 'LEGO® Brick' and the plural is of course 'LEGO® Bricks'.
WTF?
Despite your completely skewed view of why people join the military, you are still wrong. Many hundreds of thousands of people are paid with the results of public taxes. That does not mean that they give up their right to privacy.   My intention is not to compare the soldier's actions with the a child's innocence. Clearly, the soldier was well aware that joining the military could possibly mean he would be ordered to kill people. The soldier did not, however, have any reasonable expectation that he would be giving up privacy when he joined the military. (Privacy in the small sphere, yes -- he might have to use a toilet that has no stall. But not privacy in the sense that he would be subjected to public scrutiny.)  But more to the point, the people affected by the Phelps were actually the marine's family. So, even if you could argue that the marine had a reasonable expectation of public scrutiny (which you can't, but I'm humoring you, here), there is absolutely no expectation by the family of that sacrifice of privacy. So, you can apply the comparison to the family if that makes more sense to you.
You forgot that the cost to build a nuke plant is enormous that there is a nuclear waste issue that the biggest limitation on the tar sands will come from the lack of water supply not energy and then ponder the idiocy of investing in a nuclear plant to cook the tar sands.
I didn't know Vin Diesel was so deep...
A U.S. citizen has to pay tax on her income regardless of where it is earned or where she lives.  So, even if you moved your money or moved yourself, you'd still be on the hook. 
Lego prefers Lego, not "Legos".
&gt;You are right about how far back the data goes, but unfortunately it is all we have. No, that is all the media has deemed newsworthy.  http://ff.org/centers/csspp/library/co2weekly/2005-08-18/dioxide.htm Scroll down to the graph. &gt;My point is this, we have 2 options. Option three is to educate ourselves and have reasoned debate...which, I believe, is what is happening on this very page. &gt;You should also check out how badly the polar ice caps have melted. You should also know how green house gas effect works, and how much of the sun's radiation is bounced back into space through the ice caps. The first polar ice caps showed up a little before 400 million years ago. There had previously been no ice caps on the planet. The carbon dioxide levels were at ~4000 PPM at the time (they are currently at 370 PPM).
The man doesn't pay the prostitute for sex. He pays her to *leave* after the sex.
If you are rich and move out of the country for tax reasons...  find.  Try it!  Just change the law to this:  Do it, and you are a traitor and will be shot!  Your family will be shot as traitors too. Basically our government policy on that should be "try it. I dare you!"   Update: All who down-vote this comment are traitors to America and need to be shot!  
Ron Paul has demonstrated much more honesty than all of the rest of the top tier candidates on both sides combined!  Therefore, the likelihood of the Paul campaign being involved is exponentially lower, IMO, than any other camp. But no, I do not deny the **possibility** that they would be involved in it somehow,  But I do dispute the likelihood. And of course YOU brought up the criminal conspiracy where I did not. Whomever did it would be equally guilty of whatever crime was committed.  Do you deny the possibility that the RP campaign is not involved or are you just that full of blind hatred, for some reason?
They redacted BREASTFEEDING? What were they afraid of? She was transmitting something through breast milk? To her babies?
a cool carnival of pain - for everyone, not just sadomasochists.  
I've heard of privacy violations, but this is freakin' nuts.
That 17% he's talking about includes payroll taxes (social security and medicare).
But what of the son of an Appalachian turd miner?  The grandson of a goat-ball licker?  Bias, I say!  Bias!
That'd be [nuisance](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nuisance), and has nothing to do with the content of your message.
But are there links to comments? I can get that on my lil ol' [Samsung 990](http://www.tech-faq.com/samsung-sch-a990-review.shtml) by just visiting the actual page. 
Does your right include a range to it? Am I not allowed inside the city limits while you grieve? When would I be allowed back in?  These are touchy questions. Maybe you're not aware, but your reasoning has allowed people to be corralled into "free speech zones", usually very far away from where they wanted to protest. Now you're supporting this position.
Did I blame Bush? No. No I didn't. I pointed to  causes. 
And you think you can defeat botnets by posting on Reddit? Good luck with that!  BTW, what proof do you have that bots are flooding the social networking sites like Reddit?
I didn't mean privacy violation. That was dum. I meant ...forget it. I'm so mad after seeing this, I can't even say what I'm thinking.
Well, if anybody knows anything about hissy fits...
I completely disagree.  They are being given special rights afforded only to religious and charitable organizations.  You can hardly qualify this church as a charitable organization, so they are being given special status.  Not having to pay taxes on the gallons of money the steal from parishioners every week is criminal in and of itself.  They are given this tax free status under the expectation that they won't advocate hate speech or political bias to their flock.  I'm sure they're not concerned enough with their "rights" to give up their tax free status.  
I tried my best. Happy Halloween Danny!
God hates fag-haters even more.
Mmmm, comming...
Wars end.  Government programs don't.
There's more to life than maximizing profits (or rather, maximizing profits the easiest way possible), wish you could see that.
i know it appears weird, complicated and impossible right now, but all will be fine soon. don't you just worry.
Love never dies.
yeah i know because thats the 2nd time you posted that comment.
This is just a hijacked link to the Wired story. See http://politics.reddit.com/info/5zj3i/comments/c02chet  For the DKJ start of the chain.
Well, the money he earns actually helps more people.  
I've read your comments here, and you think you're not doing just the same?
fuckers
Yeah, because believing the universe just "banged" out of nothing, then evolved over billions of years in a perfect series of events up until this moment sounds a lot more plausible.
http://mediaradar.org/  http://www.safe4all.org/  http://boysite.info/blog/2007/09/26/can-a-boy-be-sexually-abused-by-a-girl-reallypart-1/  Legalizing Misandry  by Paul Nathanson  Spreading Misandry by Paul Nathanson 
hilary is a very devisive figure - the right in america absolutely HATE her with a vengence. so if she gets selected you can be damn sure that a Republican will be the next president. the right will just unite in a "anything but hilary" kind of campaign.  Obama would be a cleverer choice. He's simply just not much of a pure "hate" figure for the right.  And he offers a kind of "clean break with the past" kind of stance.  Which, I would guess, even the Ron Paulites would support - especially if the GOP offers up a Bush Mark 2 candidate.  However, I doubt that will happen -   Hilary just has too much monetary support and clout - so she will be selected. And she'll lose.
"I saw the news earlier. And later, when I saw everything chaotic...then something strange was happening...I wasn't thinking clearly."  Nothing about anyone getting cut down.
I want the Holy Hand Grenade of Antioch!
While I am a little worried about the far reaching effects of this ruling, I just have to say I am SO happy that this ruling went through the way it did.  It only means to me that if any of my many friends in the military, god forbid, gets killed, I just won't have to shoot anyone...  I also just wanted to say seriously, here is my opinion on the whole matter.  Your rights always only extend to the point where you can't infringe on other people's rights.  So while it is not explicitly written in the constitution, I believe that the parents, friends, etc. of someone who died should have the right to mourn their son without the media circus and blood lust that this group brings with them.  I am serious, I would probably seriously consider harming one of them if they ever showed up to a friend of mine's funeral.  It is such a heated emotional time that I do not think that I could handle myself the way I know is right.  So that is what these people are about.  Sure they care about their message, but only so much as to create a lawsuit out of people who assault them in order to get money.
What shit and what fan?  There is nothing to see since there is no proof of anything. The site has released nothing specific that I can find.
I'm well aware of the whole "free speech zones" issue.  our right to free speech does not give us the right to: block peoples access to work, shut down city streets, or anything else disruptive to the normal flow of every day life. I'm all for protesting and people speaking their minds.  None of this would even be in question if people used their right to protest responsibly and respectfully. *edited to note that I modded you up for a well made point, even if I disagree with it.
So sorry about dismissing your ridiculous rationalizations.
nope, sorry, not in the civilized world.
It probably thought it was a (loose) URL. You should [send feedback.](http://reddit.com/feedback)
I have seen Fred Phelps in person, along with a handful of his family/church/whatever.  on the other side of the street were a few hundred college students, myself included, some holding candles, or dressed as angles, wearing pins and holding signs of love and acceptance against their hate and intolerance.  It was amazing.  WBC has every right to be as bitchy as they want as long as they follow the law (which they seem to do, in my experience; they had a permit and in fact police protection).  but we have the right, and indeed the responsibility to drown them out and challenge their message.  They are only a handful of people.  anywhere they go, masses of people come out against them.  They mean nothing, they are not a movement, and their support is mostly from within their family.  It is their infamy, and not their influence that make them so well known.  The best way to beat them is not to make them pay financially, but to show them and the world that their brand of hate is not what we believe in.  They can spit venom all they want, but it is futile.  It brought a tear to my jaded liberal anti-war eye, when I heard that veterans were riding loud Harley's around their protests at military funerals.  That my friends, is the fucking American way.  And that is how we fight them, I love that they are having to pay a huge sum of money, but I think it does more to harm free speech than to hurt their cause.
Is this not part of some kind of 'sanctions'? By having Iran in the list, Yahoo are supplying Iran with a service, and could therefore be in violation of some sanctions set up by the US government. That's my guess at what is happening (or what I believe Yahoo's lawyers think is happening.
12 people killed, 46 wounded in a terrorist attack. Photo pictures and video from russian eye-witness in Togliatti
After reading a story, I hide it.  This way I only see stories that I haven't read.  Makes it much more interesting ...
&gt; Or let's talk about the position you're in, accepting that democracy and emancipation for women is fine for us in the West but that it isn't suited for others  You're pretending that this is what Bush is doing in Iraq.  Can we get to the real world?  Bush's rhetoric is along the lines of Kipling's "White Man's Burden".  Neither were true and just rhetoric.  &gt; how is it not doing that?  Why don't we look at the facts?  Here's what a recent [NYT][] article has to say about this:  &gt; According to... Israeli Army... [s]everal rockets have landed in and around the Israeli border town of Sderot in the past week, causing some damage but **no casualties.**  But were these rockets fired by Hamas?  &gt; Most of the rockets are being fired at Israel by smaller militant groups such as Islamic Jihad and the Popular Resistance Committees.  Is Hamas doing anything at all?  &gt; Hamas said it is was not currently launching rockets at Israel, but it **acknowledged firing** mortar shells **at Israeli military positions**, usually **in response** to Israeli actions.  This is what I meant by rhetoric of a political party.  And what were you saying again?  [NYT]: http://www.nytimes.com/2007/10/29/world/middleeast/29cnd-mideast.html?_r=1&amp;hp&amp;oref=slogin
Is amazing how the people who he outsmarts at every turn continue to question his intelligence.  His policies, his vision, his plan for the nation, all fair game.  But the man is undeniably intelligent.
&gt;&gt;I just want the socialism.  Communism, son, communism.
I disagree. Reddit's a popular site; it's not a long leap for me to imagine so many people downmodding stuff that it *looks* to each observer like a mob/conspiracy/bot.
Seems like at least 95% to me.  Of course, they're all completely uninteresting posts, so maybe that's why.  When did reddit get flooded by so many boring programmers?  Is it just because I stopped bothering to check the New page until there was no content on the main page?
Is it reasonable to give instructions  for how your remains should be treated, and expect those instructions to be followed?  While when we are dead, we're dead, and no longer can experience any suffering or humiliation, the idea of our body being mistreated by others can be very disturbing. We don't want to be dumped in a ditch; we want to be buried or cremated with due solemnity and care.  How the remains of a loved one are treated also has a direct impact on family members and friends. The perceived disrespect and antagonism reflects on them and tarnishes their memories of the person they've lost.   Finally, there is an implicit trust with everyone who handles the dead, from pathologists and morticians to med school students working on cadavers and gravediggers, to treat bodies with respect and dignity.  So: violating a corpse is a breach of trust with the original owner, even if they aren't aware of it, an act of dishonesty and disrespect. And it causes demonstrable and serious emotional harm to the relatives, who now have to bury this person knowing how her body was abused prior to the funeral, and that memory will linger on forever. Lastly, the reputation of the hospital is seriously damaged, and they may likely face a civil suit from the relatives.  I think this act is clearly unethical, on both a professional and personal level. It's depraved indifference to the will of others regarding the treatment of their remains, as well as the harm it does others affected by the act.
No, I don't either, but his reputation is not nearly as suspect as Rudy nor tied to big business like Romney.. I did not imply that you or I would know anything about it.  But Wired sure seems to make some implications even though the UAB group pointed no fingers, but just provided stats with no other data.  That I can find after searching their site.
Tell that to Bill Gates, Steve Jobs, and the founders of Google.
[Brooklyn hipsters](http://www.hipsterhandbook.com/) dress like that, and they get laid all the time.
Nothing wrong with “self” posts. My complaint is with posting this to programming, rather than the main reddit.
I'd say its a marching band.
No, as I posted above, the relatives are emotionally harmed, the reputation of the hospital is damaged, and there could quite likely be a civil lawsuit.
If you're going to accuse me of being disingenuous, then you'll have to accept that label on yourself as well for attempting to misconstrue the results of this case. Please read my comments closer to the top of this topic -- the issue is not about "silencing" anyone. It's a civil case where the plaintiffs were arguing that the defendants violated their privacy and conspired to create emotional distress. The government is not "silencing" them, so there is no freedom of expression being infringed.  Admittedly, there are certainly limits to one's "offensibility," so to speak. One cannot argue that someone of another faith speaking their mind about their religion was an attempt to create emotional distress. A reasonable person could see that was not the intention. But in this case, the defendants "conspired" to infringe the privacy of the plaintiffs. They did this by protesting at the funeral of the soldier, and argued funerals are a public event.   You should also be careful to remember that this is not "some judge" making an arbitrary decision. Indeed, this was a jury of 12 people. Of course, that doesn't mean the verdict was necessarily right, but it does mean that the Phelps family were at least heard by their peers.   Again: don't misconstrue what happened here. The case is NOT about what the Phelps family said. It's about the Phelps family taking prolonged, concerted action to disrupt this family's rights of privacy. Regardless of how YOU would have ruled, ordinary citizens DO have a right to a certain level of privacy. The jury found that the Phelps violated that privacy not because of what they said, but because of what they did. 
Most of the things that people claim Senator Byrd had named after himself is, technically, not true.  He had most of them named after his father.  Senator Byrd is a Jr. His dad was the Sr.  I know!  I know!   Peter the Great claimed St. Petersburg was named for Saint Peter too.  
I wouldn't give her a divorce.  I'd fight for an annulment.
I'm glad to see at least the television companies catching on before it's too late. I'm actually quite happy to tolerate commercials here and there; I just minimize or use mplayer's 10-second skip.
You're right. On behalf of all Paulites, I apologize. From now on we'll only try to submit and upmod news that you're interested in. I try to do this, but sometimes I forget. Mea Culpa!
I don't know about never..  Maybe not you, but many our your "team" have implied such a thing...  Well, I guess you don't have a team.. You seem like a loner here to me.
do what the gps says to do?
Underestimating the opposition is a great way to assure victory!
It's not hilarious.
The Arab states are feudal states - dangerous places to live, where things like freedom, justice, equality, fairness and opportunity are just words.
&gt; Capital gains has worse side effects than the income tax  What are they?
she doesnt stand a chance. just look at her C.V. versus Thompson, Giuliani and Romney.  and prior experience and life experience really do matter in a presidential race. The Dems could do something radical and pick Obama instead - then you're gonna get one hell of an election race.
If a rapist rapes a 21 year old instead of an 11 year old, the physical and psychological harm done might be considered slightly less grievous.   Does that mean raping adult women is ok, because the alternative is that a child might have been raped?
any woman who throws an ashtray at my head will get a punch in the face in return .... whats good for the goose etc
i am a refugee from digg as i found many of their stories inane even offensive - actually i use popurls and have found the content here 'better' - with user generated content regression to mean seems unavoidable which is unfortunate -
Agreed. It has turned really slow.
thats comic artist dave johnson. He does covers for 100 bullets among other projects.   You should google some of his art. I'm talking to you doug. 
I will, but I think the channel has run out of power...
this is why i dont usually post messages to the internet. my kingdom for a filter for stupid.
My train of thought is something like this:  1. Years ago, Cheney holds secret meetings on our energy policy. Secret why? Undoubtedly because it involves things that the American people would either a) not stand for (like nuclear war to protect oil interests) or b) not understand (like peak oil, oil crash, impending calamity, who knows).  2. We go to Iraq, which is now widely known to have been the plan long before 9/11. Side note: on the bright side, I am thankful for 9/11 in the sense that it woke a whole lot of us up, myself included.  3. Iraq turns out to be a clusterfuck. If it was about controlling oil, doing so in a manageable sense has become nearly impossible with the horrible job the Administration did with the war planning.  4. Iran is right next door, vital geographic area in terms of the assumed goal(s) listed above (all speculation mind you, I don't claim anything as fact).  5. If Iran is just going to be another Iraq, it would be easier to drop a few nukes, flatten the place and control the oil with little-to-no resistance. The use of nuclear weapons would have far-reaching effects regarding the realization by other nations and/or enemies of the lengths to which our leaders would go. These effects, I believe (in addition to nuclear fallout, among other things) could prevent an insurgency like the one in Iraq from ever becoming a permanent thorn in the side of the neocon agenda. Of course the ramifications here at home would probably be many orders of magnitude worse than they are now, as far as our civil liberties are concerned.  This is all based on the assumption that Cheney et al consider world domination (via control of the worlds energy resources through military force) more important than the ideas of real, classical freedom and liberty for our people that our country was founded upon. Personally, I believe the PNAC and other well-known neocon philosophies are examples of evidence that they indeed do consider imperialism more important. I know this might come off as extreme, and yes, it is to someone like me or most, but to people who are part of the elite - the people who are beyond financially secure and are in positions of great power, both financially and in the US Government, who thus are pretty much set for life - it is not so extreme. They will have freedom and liberty whether or not the people of our country and others are ruled under fascist dictatorship, so long as they toe the line of course. They would have every motivation to go global if this were true (and I believe it is - why else would they want global hegemony?).  Personally, I believe that most politicians and powerful people, be it economically or in our government, see the majority of the American people as something akin to farm animals - a resource. We work, be it through physical labor or mental, and the overall net result is that they get to take from us a significant portion of the fruits of our labor. Debt is our cage. They leave just enough for us in the form of meaningless entertainments and what have you (ironically, things on which to further waste our money so it can trickle back up into their hands through the corporate layer) - just enough so that we don't kick up any shit and burn this mother fucker down and start over.  Anyway, it makes sense to me in an extreme way, and as I said, I don't truly believe of any of this as fact. As **vemrion** said, nothing is as it seems. It's interesting to speculate though.  BTW, I absolutely loved the comment this headline points to. It is the best explanation of this incident that I have heard yet, and makes the most sense.  Thoughts?
Duh!!!
Don't worry.  It's just as bad on the other side of the aisle.
Truth in headlines: Scientists believe they know how chemicals came together to form adenine, one of the four nucleic bases that form DNA, and therefore one of the many fundamental building blocks of life. While an interesting discovery, it's still a long way from a complete understanding of how life began.
The ninth amendment says otherwise. There's also nothing in the Constitution allowing for the regulation of drugs.
so why should investment of money be favored over earning of money via salary or wage?  What is the moral difference?  If you sit on your ass and have enough money to live off the investments we will tax you at a lower effective rate than if you bust your ass and live off the money you earn by creating wealth in the form of goods and/or services?
Do you REALLY think the Paul campaign is involved?  I don't think you are that gullible. I think you are reaching for something that is not there....
Care to explain when he aimed nukes at us? I seem to remember Castro looking to the US for aid, and the US turned their backs on him.  He then looked to the USSR, who saw the opportunity and got nice and buddy-buddy with Castro, then shipped and deployed a bunch of missile to Cuba that Castro didn't want.  He knew he was just being used as a pawn by the USSR.
Keep it up, because you know when you stop...people will die.
This is no Digg!!
I just got spam from these guys as well. Links to a couple YouTube videos. Sender was "Freedom." Subject: "Ron Paul Assignment wtyub"
"Do you remember Thermal De-Polymerization that was supposed to provide $30/bbl oil from trash and turkey guts? Wonder how that is doing."   http://discovermagazine.com/2006/apr/anything-oil  The follow up story to the story you are talking about.  Long story short: "Production costs turned out to be $80 per barrel"
I really hope that irony was intentional!
And who says reddit posts are sensationalistic?
Ahh!  Not again!
Twit what's the NY Times?  _edit:removed profanity_
Maybe if you know the symbols and syntax, this makes perfect sense...
All of the past studies of the shale came back with an EROEI less than one. And you know why? Because of the laws of thermodynamics. There is no way to convert this crap into liquid oil and gain net energy in the process. The temperatures and times required to cook it are too high. I don't care what Shell has been "researching" for the past decade. My money is on the bet that they did not violate the laws of thermodynamics.   I'm waiting to be proven wrong on this one.
It's on his _head_.
His condescension to the Wal-Mart crowd, besides being elitist, wasn't really accurate. There are Wal-Marts everywhere, and all types of people shop there. Except Redditors -- who don't shop; Mom always picks up a few things and leaves it at the foot of the basement steps for them. 
"There's nothing in that article that mentions the songs' "Iraq War criticism."  I think it's because it is FOX!
&gt;Petroleum is the most energy dense and practical resource we have every known.  Replace energy dense and practical with 'convenient' and you are absolutely correct.  Hydrogen(by mass) has over 3 times the energy density of crude oil. But of course the array of uses and volumetric energy of crude oil clearly outweigh that of hydrogen.
There is a huge difference between the treatment of expats and natives.  -natives are prioritized over everyone else(they have separate lines for natives and expats). -natives pay a subsidized amount on utilities -only natives are allowed to attend public schools. -natives are paid a lot more. -police won't arrest natives out of fear(most cops are expats) -natives are the only ones allowed to own land. -natives receive free health care and medication.  it's basically segregation.
Yeah I like his idea of a flat tax too. A flat 0!!!
Wasn't this posted earlier this week?
Why don't the Australian youth and their leader go back to their country and get the hell out of Australia. And if they don't want to, then lets hope the Aborigines grow balls and force them out.  Notice how flawed your argument is now?
I disagree about the worst enemy of the world being dead.   Bush is still alive
EROEI's change... 
Didn't he say this, like, a WHILE ago? Old news.  Voted down. BTW, Warren Buffet's income is in the form of capital gains, which is taxed at a lower rate.  This is healthy, because speculators have to take extraordinary risks, and their risk taking is good for the economy (there'd be no growth if everyone just invested in risk free assets).  Look at it this way: let's say your income depends on a coin toss.  Heads, you make $100,000.  Tails, nothing.  How should this "income" be taxed?  Obviously, it should be a bit different from someone that makes $50,000 in risk free income.  
Ron Paul's *opponents* may be using botnets.
I wanna see the picture.
&gt; I think Dean was a gaffe machine that the Repub's could have spun the crap out of.  Cause we (Republicans) didn't have a field day with Kerry or anything.
Try E-bay for a much better computer for 200 dollars.
Well, duh.
There are limits.  We're not talking about disgreeing over who has the best chili recipe, whether a Mac is better than a PC, which Presidential candidate should get your vote, or where to go on vacation.  We're talking about saying that a person or group of people should burn in Hell or be killed because they're gay/black/in the miltary/whatever.  If Phelps wants to spread his bile to a roomful of faithful followers, fine.  But to take it outside with the specific intent to cause people emotional distress?  No way.
an old wise jewish scholar with white hair and a long grey beard once said: "if you have only shit to tell, do not tell anything to anyone at all."  contribute nothing? indeed. what exactly did *you* contribute? barking propaganda? what did you exactly add to the conversation? please let me know if you don't mind, because i really would love to know.   the US is known for stabbing allies in the back (read history: e.g. sell saddam biological weapons and hang him for using them right afterwards) - and you believe in simple sets as 'allies' - 'no allies'?   god,  the basement of your mum's must be really deep. bunker?
Seriously?  That's almost as bad as the Truthers, I think....  Wow! What the hell do you base that on?  Appearances and donations from Alex Jones and support by the neo-nazis?  Again, wow!!
hahaha great work.  My favorite song on the album... along with Capital G, God Given, The Great Destroyer... and... every other song.
The top 1% of wage earners account for 39% of tax revenues and only 19.4% of national income.  The top 25% account for 86% of tax revenue, and the top 50% account for 97% of tax revenue. The bottom 50% pay basically nothing at all. That is EXTREMELY progressive, maybe even unhealthy. Do we really want the majority of voters to pay nothing towards the programs they vote for?  Mr. Buffet can write the government a check if he is upset. 
wow what a controlling, violent, psycho bitch.  He should run screaming from that marriage, and tell all his friends.  I hope he doesn't have kids.
errr... i dont think they've got idiots on the GOP side this time.  With Bush , i would have nearly agreed with you , since he was clearly a frat-boy type - but look at the current GOP front runners.  Thompson - a lawyer AND an actor AND a politican.  one hell of a life story and career.  Guiliani - ferocious anti-crime bulldog who busted the mafia.  NYC "broken windows" crime fighting career. The guy is a human fireball of "doing stuff" and getting results.  Romney - ran a private equity firm that turned 160 companies around, managed the Seattle Winter Olympics - a turned a profit out of it, and then governor of the mostly Democratic Massachusetts  hmmm.. i wouldnt call any of them "dumb".  "Her positions are so much in the middle between dems and conservatives"  she's not - she's on the radical left. She was the person who wanted to create a socialist health system in the U.S..  sorry, but i dont buy the "centrist" argument.
Then the chemicals Spelled the word god in English!
I don't think rape is "fine" under any circumstances.  But I do think that  1. society should at least consider allowing consensual sex between adults and children 2. society should not judge premeditated pedophiles any differently than premeditated rapists 3. society should recognize that just like any rapist, a pedophile is succumbing to desires that are a product of forces beyond his or her control.  In other words, a man who desires to have sex with children should not be considered to be any worse of a person than a man who desires to have sex with women his own age.  The first man only becomes a "bad person" when he acts out those desires in a way that causes harm to others or breaks the law.  *Edit: I understand that what I'm saying is extremely controversial.  In fact, it makes me a little squeamish myself.  But I don't see any essential difference between raping a child and raping an adult.  You could argue that rape is going to devastate the child more.  If that is true, then I guess the punishment for raping a child should be heavier.  But I do think that our society is excessively paranoid with pedophilia.
I did not rationalize.  You had no argument so you reverted to juvenile semantics.
I can't believe I never get any.  I get like 300 spams a day on 4 different accounts...
I'm glad that was signed "IMHO" because, you know, I had no idea that it was somebody's opinion.  I was thinking, "Wow, this must be absolute fact!"  But then *bam*, he puts the IMHO in there, and it completely changed everything for me.  My mind is blown!  IMHO
While it's true that in bare fisted or bare open handed fights, men who are more muscular than women are more capable of causing bodily damage, there are plenty of women who are more muscular than men.  Women are more likely to see smaller physical attacks as reasons to call the police.  Men are more likely to hide the fact if they are victims of smaller attacks, even if they occur with great frequency.   Prejudices still tend toward notions of male violence and womanly innocence/victimhood.  Police are more likely to arrest men than women, even when women are the aggressors, and even when women are arrested, they are less likely to be convicted and are less likely to lose homes, children, finances, or otherwise face stiff penalties.  Woman can hit, hard, repeatedly, and with impunity.  http://reddit.com/info/5zjis/comments/c02chzf  **According to the Centers for Disease Control, men comprise over 35% of all domestic violence victims. A meta-analytic review of 552 domestic violence studies published in the Psychological Bulletin found that 38% of the physical injuries in heterosexual domestic assaults are suffered by men.** http://www.glennsacks.com/octobers_domestic_violence.htm
Right, since technology doesn't yet allow us to print on socks reliably.
I don't believe it.
There's a great Futurama episode about this.
Depends who has issued them.  In AMEX's case, American Express issued you the card. In the case of a small local bank, you may have less leverage. It can depend, though.
You ain't the only one wanting some typing skills.  I spend more time correcting than anything else. If Reddit didn't have a spell check, my comments would look like random crap!
&gt;  Terror in the Skies...  That was pretty weck.
Holy crap!  That's pretty scary.
Just curious... worse than Kerry vs Bush?
I don't think so either...  but I don't see you as a conspiracy theorist either...
They will, however, take debit cards processed by the mastercard/visa debit processing agencies.
*I* am reverting to juvenile semantics? *Seriously?*  "It is not a sexist statement because it is referring to the second-order simulacra woman who..." is *not* an argument based entirely on ridiculous semantical games?
"dont ask don't tell" works two ways, cause, she was *really* up modding the lap dances I gave her.
&gt;it wouldn't be a reasonable thing to expect that there's better footage somewhere. as i keep asking you, why do you think they would have it?  It wouldn't be reasonable to expect one of the highest value military targets in the world to have an adequate surveillance system? That doesn't make sense.  &gt;the government does not know 9/11 is coming  There was lots of terrorist chatter and the US had been struck by major terror attacks in the previous decade. It would be very surprising if the Pentagon didn't take this possible threat seriously  &gt;the pentagon is a high value military target, and was scheduled for retrofitting in 2001.  Your linked article says nothing about retrofitting the Pentagon's security.  And as for the second scenario, I'm not sure if I get your point. You're suggesting they deliberately didn't have adequate surveillance? Why?
Yes, I remember that and was trying to think what magazine I might have seen it in. I don't think I ever read Dr. Dobbs but given the time frame for me, it was probably an Amiga magazine.
it says decoding women, does it not?  and it's not gender, it's sex in this instance. gender takes into consideration much more than just your biological workings. i'm embarrassed that this made it to reddits front page.  for a group of people that think themself so liberal and progressive, this is pathetically archaic and chauvinistic.
So, has he asked for a threesome yet?
Crap more dupes!! Prison planet must pay reddit or something!
&gt; Suse is the only major KDE-based distro, imho.  fixed it for you
Actually I think that the price will come down. That's why everyone is saying, BUY BUY BUY. They are trying to unload their own gold. People are also trying, on tv, to buy your "worthless" gold because they know that it is valuable now. The only time you should buy gold is when the value is DOWN, not up, unless you are going to pay some schmuck $100 and oz and re-sell quickly.  Same with stocks. The only time it seems that you should buy stocks is not when people say, buy my stocks.  People are just stupid. 
(upmodded for reminding me of that)
Have you ever watched police chases? They catch the guy at the end, but he doesn't get charged with just robbery or whatever they were chasing him for, he gets charged also with reckless driving and all the red lights and stop signs and dangerous maneuvers he made during the pursuit. The church guys were there practicing their freedom of speech rights - all power to them. Did they cause emotional distress? Yes. And now they'll pay for it. This is the single point I've been making since the beginning. I can't be any clearer than that. 
fair is fair, so when one of those MOFO's die...I think a large group should show up to that funeral and give em a bit of their own medicine..
Obama is the only electable Democratic candidate. Hilary is almost guaranteed to hang herself with her multiple stances on the same issue and Edwards is a lightweight.
As much sense as a man in the sky popping out of nowhere controlling everyone of our lives.
While that was certainly true in some of the cases, there were just as many of these 0% tax people who were not retired and claimed annual income levels of 500K or higher. When I asked some people about this (not at that firm of course), it became clear that there are more than a few discreet advising agents who specialize in managing numerous ways for very wealthy people to protect thier assets and income from being taxed at all, without having to worry about IRS red flags and such. I mean, we've all heard of that offshore banking stuff, but that is apparently just one avenue in a very sophisticated network of tax bypass methods.  
Dean is an extremely clever and engaging man.Very uplifting kind of character. I was amazed that he lost to the dour and boring John Kerry. after the Dems picked Kerry I knew that they'd lost the election.  but then again, there was the Dean "roar" that ruined it.
They're nothing but faries with steel wings anyway.
You're the one with the rape fixation aren't you?  I remember you.  You're a man-hating psycho.  I don't know why you bother to come around reddit; we cater to different varieties of psycho here.  
This is why he was downmodded; get used to it.  He is. but it comes in spurts..
As a UD alum I find it highly unlikely that this is being reported correctly.  There are always some high handed idealogues at uni's but this would be just batshit insane, and UD was definitely not brimming with this kind of crap when I was there, and I've not heard any of the more recent grads comment on anything similar.  I think the guys behind this site are just reactionary, in other words.
You can't claim that it in any way resembles idiomatic CSS, though.  It would be trivial for other vendors to support the changes the way Apple has proposed them (or not -- they used a vendor prefix for a non-standard CSS extension, just like almost everyone else, unlike MS). Supporting Microsoft's method would, from the looks of it, require faking a DirectX implementation and parsing what amount to class initializers.  Honestly, I'm not annoyed that Microsoft has done it, and it's great that it degrades gracefully (unless a future CSS spec includes a filter attribute, in which case you'll now have broken CSS). Proprietary vendor extensions aren't bad in and of themselves. I do however think Apple's solution is prettier.
I never said Comcast blocked Google, only that their behavior invites scrutiny.  Comcast has broken (and still does break) TCP connections they don't like with forged RST packets.  Comcast does lie about it with PR speak.  So when we start seeing RST packets where they shouldn't be, it's only fair to guess they may be from Comcast.
Yes every process that's been tried to date has  EROEI of less than one.  Shell *supposedly* has a different one.  You are certain theirs will not be a net positive, I am merely doubtful based on past experience.  That's where we differ.
Did you define exchange?
and for being a repeat from last week.
By "oldie" I mean:  http://reddit.com/info/44zu/comments
There Is a God: How the World's Most Notorious Atheist Changed His Mind (Hardcover) And made MORE money. Hope he gives it to God, cuz everyone knows god only has dollars and is looking to unload them for dineros.
I call shenanigans. that computer is actually in one of the Carnegie Mellon University computer clusters.  i have seen it work with my own eyes, and yes: it is a capacitance thing.
Paul would clobber clinton
No one is disputing that invested/banked money isn't doing anything.  What's being argued is that the people who actually *do something* should be taxed less than the people who *don't do anything*. If I'm sitting on my ass sipping margaritas all day living off returns on my investments, I shouldn't be paying less taxes (as a percent) than the guy who's actually working all day and contributing to the economy in a direct way.
Am I wrong in thinking that you'd need to install the pkg as root/su by typing your login in order to install the trojan?  If so, shouldn't that alert the vast majority of people of the danger of the unsolicited software upgrade?
yeah... who'd want to say that they just don't know, but they think that they know..
Anyone know if this is quality stuff, or the usual cheap shit?
This makes me sad.
i thought the us was the us's biggest oil supplier.
It could make for a fantastic judgment reading though.  "We find the WBC not guilty of the aforementioned invasion of privacy. The values of this country and our constitution, which late marine swore to protect, do not allow the limitation of speech no mater how ungrateful and reprehensible the ones who speak may be."
This is the first one I've ever gotten. Kind of surprising. Do you comment on the YouTube videos? That could be how they track people down. I have no idea.
What in the hell would Israel have to do with Oil Shale in the American West and whether or not it can be a viable source of net energy.
If they were endless, then RP would have endless support.  Are you somehow saying that RP is unaware of all of this going on around him?  Or is he complicit in it? And there is really only a choice between him and a socialist, neocon, imperialist state.  Even with the demos.  Sorry, I have to choose him.  I know, the socialist, neocon sounds contradictory to some extent...
[Read](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Communism), son, [Read](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Real_socialism)
&gt; Lang and Appleyard proved their technique by getting 16 live E. coli cells to spell out "MIT" on a chip.  *Don't touch the wet paint!*
No no I'm not.  Please I've said too much already.
Bodily fluids? Are you kidding? Since when is there sex in the champagne room?
Except the staff is more like something a shinto priest would carry. The jangles were to ward evil spirits.
what's scary about it
I wonder how the speed compares with Stalin? (At least for the subset of Scheme both can compile...)
makes me glad i work abroad. i have yet to see such a good time to send money home with the dollar being worth so little. next time i am at home a steak dinner in NYC will feel cheap.  never thought i'd say that.
John Edwards snatches a key endorsement from Barack Obama with a controversial de facto vote.
Seldom...  But one of my addresses has been on a list for years..  Know what, I hardly ever check the results of the spam filter.  Hmmm, maybe I should..
Thats not going to fly. Pretty drunk can't be used as an excuse for breaking a trust or he would receive alcohol sanctions from a woman like that.
Have you seen a strip club ashtray?  Those big industrial glass things meant for a half dozen drunk guys at a table?  Big, heavy, and near indistructable.
they should do ANWR before they do boulder
Yes I did know. Next time try a better headline. 
&gt; block peoples access to work, shut down city streets, or anything else disruptive to the normal flow of every day life.  would that also include not paying the kings taxes and refusing to board British troops in your house?  It makes sense that we're simply a colony and must submit to the rules laid out by the House of Commons, but they are a long ways off and we deserve a bit of consideration for our loyalty to the crown. In addition, I agree that there aren't enough billets at the local hotels and we should open our houses to the british troops, but why are they here in the first place?  We have truly lost sight of what it means to be free when we start rationalizing why this or that group deserves not to have a freedom.  This is America and it was founded on everyone getting freedom, not just the ones we like.
Was anyone else confused by the picture of the eagle staring at the orangutans with the fish on it's head? 
Looks like it has to de-cloak before it can fire its weapons.  Typical.
No, if you own a company that *made* $8m one year, you should pay more than $4k in taxes.
An Obama v Romney race would be interesting to say the least.  neither are WASPs for starters. it would be a real break from the past in terms of what a "suitable" presidential candidate should be.
What are you blathering about? I'm not giving up my authority to decide anything - but you **cannot** decide anything without hard, accurate, verifiable facts.   anonymous, uncited, unverifiable information is not to be trusted. End of story.  Again, I don't think you have the slightest idea what the word "evidence" means. Demanding the ability to verify the truth of a story is not "giving up" your ability to decide.  Unless you think "deciding" means "indulging in private fantasies".
Another "Fridge" in the making!
Thank you. It wasn't terribly off, but definitely not the same thing.
My ex-wife sounds a lot like this woman in the article.  She was physically and emotionally abusive.  I took it for 3 years and then one day I just snapped (she tried to stomp on my bare feet with her pointy high heeled shoes).  After we got back from the emergency room I went and got a hotel room and filed for divorce the next day.
Woo hoo!  Where's mine?  Bet'cha it'll be cheaper than the iPhony out of the box.  And it's Verizon.  Woo Hoo!
I am confident of my opinions because my opinions are well-defined and rational.  Your opinions are ill-defined and irrational.  Put simply, you have not presented a rational argument for me to address.
Yeah because criminal spamming botnets are notorious for donating millions of dollars to "longshot" American presidential candidates.  Can someone ban this troll already?
I've heard so many insane things about those freaks in Dubai. Stories like this one, or of the booming sex slave trade over there, the rampant murder, decadence and materialism of the elite. Couple that with the way they treat expats and their backwards legal system, and it doesn't take much sense to see what a shithole Dubai really is.
Neither do I. This made it through. I should probably check it as well.
holy FUCKING SHIT.  he said this literally over a YEAR ago.  why the fuck is this shit on the main page???  i'm sorry, but SERIOUSLY.
Dubai's a midieval shithole, built on slavery. People are lured to Dubai with the promise of decent jobs, then have their passports taken away and put in camps. The West's love affair with it shows how little it actually values democracy.
Geezus... and here I thought the height of human accomplishment was cheese in a can!
&gt; They will probably start dumping them, causing a drop in the price  Pure speculation.  Why would the holders of hundreds of billions of dollars worth of assets dump them and vaporize their wealth?!  &gt;  I will sacrifice my life to preserve the freedoms that this country protects, if I have to.  Let's not be melodramatic, okay?  We're talking about interest rates, not terrorism.  &gt; It is not falling. Yet. But it may, if the cut the rates just a bit more.   This is exceedingly unlikely.  Rates are at nowhere near their historic lows.  &gt; You know, at one point, America had a system, where if everyone worked hard for themselves, the country profited.  Well, I certainly didn't mean help the country by sitting on the couch.  Get your ass to work.  Work for yourself, and the economy grows stronger.  Where did this get lost in translation?  &gt; I think I will move my money into stocks, as much as I can.   I said "invest your money and help the country grow strong" - you're agreeing with me.  Or do you take "invest your money and work hard" to mean something *other* than putting it in the market and working for yourself?  As far as I can tell you didn't actually refute any of my points, but rather were agreeing with them!
this article wont get enough attention because of your crappy headline good job  
How dare a man tell you he's not attracted to women at all!  ...oh, wait...
Yes, this is true, and it's hurting the quality of the site. Please, Reddit. Fix this.   Oh, and try and figure out why new submissions are being sniped off the moment they're posted, too.   Thanks.
learn how to make a difference and make money at the same time doing what you love. Teleseminars offer flexibility, freedom, fun and financial rewards.  Mind map of the benefits of using teleseminars and the mistakes to avoid... get a FREE guide emailed to you http://paulrecommends.blogspot.com/2007/10/teleseminar-secrets-free-guide-top-5.html  &lt;a href="http://paulrecommends.blogspot.com/2007/10/teleseminar-secrets-free-guide-top-5.html"&gt;Teleseminar Secrets Mind Map Page&lt;/a&gt;
Nothing in the ninth amendment mentions drugs. Its IMO saying that the federal government shouldn't overstep its bounds.  I would imagine that most laws against marijuana are local and state laws. Technically the ninth amendment doesn't protect you from these laws.
I agree. Its his best since Tunnel of Love. Which was 20 years ago....
Its just an article I might have passed up if I wasnt as bored as I was. Food for thought... 
Yeah, I know, I was kidding mostly. But dayum...how deluded can these guys be? It's sad.
Utterly misleading headline.
quite an aberration for a search engine company
&gt;We have truly lost sight of what it means to be free when we start rationalizing why this or that group deserves not to have a freedom. &gt;This is America and it was founded on everyone getting freedom, not just the ones we like.   So what about this family's right to grieve in peace?  Are they not allowed that right? Remember that we all have the right to "...life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness..."?  I would argue that their right to a protest-free funeral would fall under "life" and "liberty".
What percentage of net imports does oil represent?  Hint: not as high as you may think.
I really like this hotel !
Vader? Dang near kill - Oh wait.
&gt;On your citizenship: congradts! Many Americans would love to get their hands on that, and can't. The Irish don't make it easy :-)  They make it easier than most countries.  Basically all you need are official copies of a grandparent or parent's birth or baptismal records.  I had to go to the parish church in Moycullen to get 'em for my grandfather, but it was worth it because now I don't have to travel as an American, and I was in the area in any case. I cordially disagree with regards to Joyce.  One of the things to remember is that he wrote in a different era when a hint was equivalent to what we would now consider yelling in one's face.  It's been years since I read it last as an undergraduate, but I seem to remember that "The Dead" ended with a song in Gaelic, and a  quite shocking --for those times-- diatribe on Parnell's ultimate treatment.  These were not "safe" subjects at the time, and certainly Joyce was stirring up trouble deliberately.  (The same goes for that story in "Dubliners" --don't remember the name-- that's about child molestation, though obviously Joyce couldn't be straightforward or explicit.  My hunch is that he was saying something about the Catholic priesthood that only now, one hundred years later, is even starting to be publicly acknowledged; that's how far ahead of his time he was.)  Anyhow, if you read carefully --and you really have no choice but to do so-- you will find that both "Ulysses" and "Finnegan's Wake" are saturated with subtle yet powerful images of Irish nationalism, and all this in spite of the fact that Joyce was Anglo-Irish and not even of Gaelic descent.  (I think a great part of his love for Irish culture had to do with the way the Irish use language.  It is one of our great gifts, the bardic heritage, call it blarney or whatever; the English may have invented the language, but it took the Irish to perfect it.)     
i remember reading a while back that it's morse code for "connecting" haha
Actually In Rainbows is the exact opposite of a shitty record.
And the point we're making is that you now support suppression of groups because they make others feel bad. I'm sure the President himself would feel bad if there was a negative protester along his route of travel.
Great book! One of Asimov's best.  On a side note, anyone notice that the planet mentioned in the article doesn't actually exist [yet?]? 
Ah, but with a warranty?
At least GOP representatives don't have that kind of problem. 
Feline-Diesel?  This car is "kitty=powered"?  smells like cat-shit when it goes by?
Have you ever seen a man eat his own head?
Yeah, not a very pretty face.
Sure, and when it starts happening, it might pose a problem.  Until then, I'm following the CPI reports, not what people on reddit spout.  http://www.bls.gov/news.release/cpi.nr0.htm
DUH!!!  Did you have to ask?  The answer is clear...of course he's crazy.
Oh, and throwing an ashtray to the face can be seen as a resonable response? If he's guilty of breaking trust, she's guilty of having NO trust on her future husband at all.  In this case, the physical violence experienced is a much worse violation of the tenants of the relationship.
well, that should be obvious, [since i already stated it.](http://politics.reddit.com/info/5zj19/comments/c02cgrx)
For some reason, I can't take you seriously monkeycum.
It's nice !
One more reason why we need the **[FairTax](http://www.fairtax.org/site/PageServer?pagename=about_faq)**!!!!
What are you smoking?
where do we have hydrogen wells?
I can't help but notice that you are a crazy twit.  Have you noticed this as well?
It seems like a rather sticky issue I think. Where do you draw the line between creating emotional distress and freedom of speech? This could get out of hand when some whiny people start complaining about anything contrary to their views and call it "emotionally distressing." I hate the WBC...but they really are following the bible's teachings. 
&gt; Real wages go down as prices rise but wages lag behind.   Real wages down only if inflation goes up.  Show me the inflationary numbers you are basing your discounted salaries against.  Oil doesn't count.  Try using a real basket, like the national CPI.  Or are you just going to spout another reason why the CPI is a conspiracy, too? 
story of my battle to get "RevoLOUtion" distributed and how i invented PAY WHAT IT"S WORTH AFTER THE MOVIE.. etc... enjoy
Um, you too?  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Socialism
"Hey guys, guess who voted against this (besides the US).   Israel"  if i was israel, i would have done the same: keep up all the fears - islam and communism makes americans shit pants (and helps the cause anyway).
Well, there are parties where the strippers show up instead of the guys going to the club.  
What kind of drug-addled dweeb would actually think that's an actual "(PIC)" of an invisible tank?
Make a little ghetto for them to rule over. Scram the Ron Paul spam from the Hot and New pages.
i just noticed that too. random factoids "hagfish purses" and .... you know.. it could actually have been a 4th grade book report. it is written that badly.
Unless those documents were created by some prof working on his own, it looks pretty legit to me.  
&gt; If you are exporting more then you are importing then a weak dollar is good.   The idea is to start exporting MORE, genius.
I thought the same thing. They must've chosen it to reduce technical support: since there's no Start-ish menu, their only choices are Internet and, uh, Internet.
come on now...everyone knows they have achieved far more than they even thought was possible when the monkey was appointed president by the supreme court back in 2000. what is left for team bush to do, really?
dons graduated and got a job. 'Tis what happened.
Downvoted for not being [the direct link](http://googlesystem.blogspot.com/2007/10/google-to-connect-to-other-im-networks.html).
We can't let the number of purple items on this bus go below 25!!!!!!!!
So, why didn't the Dixie Chicks get played on radio in 2005?  They were sure as hell commercial, and they were NOT "too old."
Habeeb it!
Isn't freedom an extremist position?  What does "success" look like in Iraq? We want peace: DIE MOTHER FUCKER. This isn't an interview/discussion. The guy isn't even listening to him. This is just softball propaganda.
Join us on 26 February at 6:30 PM at Little Falls Church for a SPAGHETTI DINNER to benefit this wonderful organization!   oh boy...
I love it when people who are making clearly close-minded statements defend themselves by saying "lighten up," it's only a joke. Yeah, super funny. Professional women are bitches! (Watch out!) Feminists are fat! It's a fucking insult to feminists and fat women alike.  Yeah, we're not stupid. We see that it's a joke. And we're not laughing. Crux_, I'm getting sick of reddit too...  Also, this was another gem from the "best" of CL: http://www.craigslist.org/about/best/pit/453035602.html  Disgusting...
It does.  I still remember a lot of the hurt from the AIDS epidemic from the 80's and 90's, and it seems with the new drugs, that things are getting better.  But then THIS happens, and I get depressed again. sigh
drinkinggames.reddit.com seems more appropriate
ok. let me then ask, what about hillary drove you to make that first comment? how is it obvious to you that she isn't sincere in some of her positions and which are they?  for example, i'm hopeful that her hawkishness is an act to seem tough on terror driven by some campaign analyst of hers, and not reflective of an actual desire to go to war with more countries. does that make more sense?
As the dollar becomes less stable the value and therefore the price of gold will go up.  No one is saying buy buy buy, but as the dollar declines as a reserve currency there needs to be a balance maintained of stability for currency reserve.  Hence the rising price of gold basically taking over for the stability of the dollar which is an empirical test against the robustness and value of the dollar, and therefore of the American economy.  If you buy gold at 800, and it goes to 5k-10k because of inflation then thats a pretty good investment. Buy gold @ 800, cash out @ ~10k -&gt; buy google, microsoft, dell, IBM for 50 bucks each.  Maybe not Mircosoft since they have enough cash to not produce a product for 5+ years. People selling gold to infomercials on TV are like checks cashing for old people + HSN  I was referring to the Gold as an alternative to the dollar, akin to the Euro, Yen.  We're not going to make one of those our money if the dollar collapses will we? Therefore as the dollar crashes as it is doing, gold will take over until the Amero comes out for US, Mexico, Canada. Bush already drove the train off the edge of the cliff now the fuel cars are starting to fall down too, next the vault cars, then the people cars-&gt; question is how many people cars and will we be able to save any part of the train?
When a company posts a "better than expected" loss, stockholders realize a capital gain even though the company paid no income taxes.  My taxed income comes from consumers buying products via their post-tax income.  Isn't that "double taxation?"  Why is it better to hurt the US labor market competitiveness than the capital market competitiveness?
&gt; Uh oh, must've struck a nerve to get you all riled up like that  Yeah, that's my idiot-fearmonger detecting nerve.  It's been taking a real beating lately.
&gt; quakers  [Which branch?](http://www.quakerinfo.org/quakerism/Branches.html)  I'm partial to the unprogrammed silent branch, no clergy; liberal and focused on the inward; service work; etc.  &gt; puritanical  Ahh... no thanks! ;]
the mainstraim music industry will continue in more or less the same form for a good number of more years (though i believe eventually it will disappear) primarily because of marketing.  sure, a band with the resources of audioslave may not need a big time label per se, but a new band will not be able to tell people about their music and distribute it (purevolume and online downloads aren't enough just yet)
The article is wrong, for what it is worth. Margaret Spellings is still the Secretary of Education, and she was one of his Texas Republicans (replacing another Texas Republican in the cabinet, so the confusion is slightly understandable).
Yet another thing I have no use for, but glad that I am aware of.
No chimpanzees knew sign language.  All sign languages are "natural languages" in that they are exactly as expressive as any spoken language.  See [American Sign Language][ASL] and [Nicaraguan Sign Language][NSL] as examples.  Nicaraguan Sign Language is special because it was [invented][]\* by children in Nicaragua over a period of only 20 years.  For a detailed and easy explanation of chimpanzees and other apes failing to use sign language see Language Instinct by Steven Pinker. Here's what Wikipedia says about [Nim Chimpsky][NC], another famous chimp that allegedly knew sign language:  &gt; the study concluded that [Nim Chimpsky] hadn't acquired anything the researchers were prepared to designate worthy of the name "language" although he had learned to repeat his trainers' signs in appropriate contexts.  \* AAAS membership required.  [ASL]: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/American_Sign_Language#Linguistics [NSL]: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nicaraguan_Sign_Language [invented]: http://www.sciencemag.org/cgi/content/abstract/305/5691/1779?ijkey=b9bb6bd0152fdd602bdf4e0a3cddcad93d203c45&amp;keytype2=tf_ipsecsha [NC]: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nim_Chimpsky  EDIT: I wonder if people realize that it is an insult to deaf and dumb people that cannot speak and rely on signing to communicate to compare their modes of communication to the lower apes.  It wouldn't be an insult if the apes *could* indeed sign, but they can't.
the facilities are well equipped and the service is good !
a ghost, Charlie Brown style
My links don't turn purple anymore.
The Fed is going to put the next Hitler into power, and everyone in America is going to go broke?  Sometimes I really wonder what reality you guys live in.  The Fed is trying to AVOID hyper-inflation, not "do it on purpose", you fucking tool.
My city is going to vote on raising taxes to fund a library.  If the taxes are raised, it will be because we chose the raise.  Where is the gun?
It's really akin to perpetuum mobile. Every year or two we have a self deluded kook who shows off their contraption only to be thoroughly discredited weeks later. There is a non zero probability that one of these days one of those kooks will produce a perpetual motion machine. But you might as well believe in leprechauns.  The shale is the same way. To have an EROEI greater than one they would have to violate the laws of physics. There is a certain amount of energy that must be injected to get a barrel of oil out of the shale. Unfortunately that amount of energy is greater than what is in a single barrel of oil. No amount of research is going to change that. Ever fancier contraptions might mask that fact or use energy sources that are still fairly cheap but the reality of the oil shale's crappiness will catch up with them too.
Recipe for accomplishing nothing:  When you disagree with a person on one point, conclude they are wrong about everything else.
Actually I read about a real product a little while ago that claimed to add years of age to your wine in minutes.
I really don't think this stuff is sexist.  If you use those sorts of words in a personal ad, chances are you're nothing special.
Downmodded for gloating in title.
Odd that you can use a phrase like "cast aspersions" and yet completely lack reading comprehension. I said I'd never *use* Comcast, not that I'd never heard of them.  Also there is no such thing as 100Gbit or 1000Gbit yet.  10Gbit is as high as it goes on the corporate side of things right now - Cisco's barely written the specs for 100G. Also video conferencing works just fine these days with DSL or cable, and clocks in at around 1Mbps.  Have you used Xbox Live or iChat before?  Both good examples.  Troll moar.
So our children can pay for our excess?  No thanks.  I'm responsible.
_comment not deleted_
No.  Too many of them, but no where near all.
Yes, how badly fucked are we...  In the end, at least for me, the choice of a system it's about moral and ethic roots. As you put it, in practice (or in the long run for the best attempts) each system kinda goes to hell.
Hey, Doc, it hurts when I do my arm like this!
[reddit.com] only post shit that's worthwhile.
Let me guess: * xkcd  * any female
"putting him on course to go head to head with Rudolph Giuliani for the Republican nomination"  When Paul comes up with $100 million, he can go head-to-head with Giuliani. Grassroots presidential candidates are a longshot in any race.
It is strange that liberals only worry about the deficit when they can use it as an excuse to raise taxes. (Murray Rothbard)
Hot -&gt; This Hour is the new Hot Page.
Bzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzz
So basically people cannot get raped by record labels any more? How sad indeed.
Yes, and I have [XKCD](http://xkcd.com/336/)!
I'm for that; Ron Paul and xkcd...
The 6th guy reminds me of every gamer I know. You're lucky to get a coherent sentance out of them when they're concentrating like he was. I'm surprised he even made eye contact with the Sumo Wrestler
&gt; life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness...  unless I'm mistaken, thats the declaration of Independence, but I understand your point.  &gt; So what about this family's right to grieve in peace? Are they not allowed that right?  They are allowed to grieve, but it is a federal employee that died and he was in support of a government policy these protesters were apparently against. Where else but to make their voice heard by everyone?  Shouldn't the family be more angry at the government that got them into the war that killed their son? I don't think the WSB ever knew the soldier that died, it wasn't about a single person. They had a message they felt needed to be heard and they tried expressing it.  I suppose now I can complain how emotionally offended I am to have abortions performed in this country or prayer removed from the schools. Our level of tolerance to deviant behavior just went down a notch.
I feel so lucky that I was in there for that 6 minutes.
That was really cool looking, but some exposition would be nice.
Here's my problem with it:  sexual offender != child predator and most states, and retardedly paranoid people can't understand the distinction when they're pulling out the pitchforks and burning torches.
&gt; and throwing an ashtray to the face can be seen as a resonable response?  What on earth gave you that idea?   Of course not. Is marrying someone who throws ashtrays at your face for not keeping your agreements a reasonable thing to do?   &gt; she's guilty of having NO trust on her future husband at all.  I completely agree. But thats his problem and he apparently has chosen to live within that reality till death do they part.  &gt; In this case, the physical violence experienced is a much worse violation of the tenants of the relationship.  Again I agree. Someone, presumably his best man, should have recognized the psycho bitch for what she was and let him know about it. But alas its often hard to convince friends that they are with inadequate psychos.
Cool. Ubuntu to the rescue. Ballmer will have a grand mal when he sees this.
Wow: you don't understand statistics at all, do you?
Calling an abortion doctor a murderer could also "cause emotional distress".  Under no circumstances should pissing people off make you lose a 10 million dollar court case, free speech and all that good stuff you know?
&gt;Everyone is in big debt when they finish an undergraduate degree.  So, first off that isn't true; however, that wasn't what I was talking about.  The debt I was talking about was accrued in law school.   By contrast, at least in engineering and computing, one gets *paid* while pursuing the PhD.
&gt;this is why i dont usually post messages to the internet. my kingdom for a filter for stupid.  your second sentence is satisfied by your first
You serious? An American in, say, England, has to pay the US taxes? Wow.  As an Indian, I dont have to pay taxes to the Indian Government when living in the US...  [In India, the richer you are, the more you are taxed.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Income_tax_in_India#Tax_Rates),
"If you do not produce the documents by November 6, we will be forced to ask again, but more stridently and with a vaguely threatening overtone."
yeah but that's not by choice, but because Salvation Army has specials and the laids, normally are picked up at Salvation Army as well.
It is annoying that they went into the whole downloading thing with the intent to sign with a record label... and release additional songs on the CD.   Lousy deal for anyone who actually paid for the downloads (unless you don't mind not having the missing songs).  As for Niggy Tardust, I'm already pre-ordered.
I don't understand... it says she died in 1951... do you mean they *will* survive for 60 years? That would mean until 2011.
Those who comment on the article itself, not just the title (unless it's something like this, of course).
shouldnt we be tolerant of their intolerance
I could use it.
if the nominations go to clinton and rudy "9/11" giuliani, i pray for the sake of america that general disgust with the whole process produces a viable third party.   oh, who am i kidding.
I didn't even know Dad's were Canadian!  Thanks foreigner! 
Actually the application menu can have quite a list. The e team uses the freedesktop.org specs with their menu and so .desktop files are used to find installed applications and add them to the list. 
That would mean reversing two decades of trends.   You really think we will be able to compete with china in the exporting market?  I bet you do.
huh, yeah, as a newbie (1 week here) I am generally pretty damn depressed by this news. But I can't stop reading it! Sigh...
It always annoyed why there are so many WWII games lately, his guy really has a very nice theory about it. "[...] rather than any of these wishy-washy recent wars where they just run in, stomp all over developping nations and run out again declaring victory[...]"
[Brandon Carl Vedas](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Brandon_Vedas) was, by all accounts, hardcore.
Now we know which side of the hivemind you are on.
no because a living human being is being harmed..... who gets harmed when the victim is a corpse ?
Just the fact that you call the oscilating cars a "sport" should be enough hint.
Rippa is a gangsta.
Then it looks like you've chosen which side you want to believe. Willfully ending another human's life must not be a crime any more. This whole discussion reeks badly of someone being presented with inconsistencies in the Bible and trying to justify them.
What I want to know is when there will be a protocol for a user on one social networking site to become "friends" with a user on another site.  Like email: gmail can send mail to yahoo, can send mail to hotmail, etc., because of the open SMTP protocol.
Biggest con of the 20th century: lowering cholesterol levels does NOT increase your life span.  It may improve the quality of your life (perhaps not the enjoyment of food however) but it will not let you live a single minute longer.  ADD LIFE TO YEARS - NOT YEARS TO LIFE!
Help them how? Maybe by putting out a video to ensure there are no more victims? That's far, far more effective at balancing the scales than whatever bullshit do-gooder crap you're gonna propose. It's obvious he genuinely changed his opinions. Just because he was a hardass narc who got in trouble with local politicos doesn't mean he was forced to quit. He could have continued as a narc in another jurisdiction. He could have continued as a cop without being a narc. He chose to quit. That shows some balls and not doucheness. Has it occurred to you that you're arguing "profiting from evil and exploiting others' misery" with a radical communist? And that I don't buy your line of argument at all? That's kinda like telling an Evangelical "Jesus loves you" and them saying back "umm I don't think he does", or to a capitalist "greed is good" and them saying back "well, it kinda depends on the circumstances". If you can't convince a *communist* that this ex-pig is exploiting people and profiting from misery, how likely is your position to be true?
&gt;They are allowed to grieve, but it is a federal employee that died and he was in support of a government policy these protesters were apparently against. Where else but to make their voice heard by everyone? How about Arlington National Cemetery if you feel it needs to be at a cemetery?  (but not while someone is being buried, thanks.  let's have a little respect for the fucking dead and their families)  How about outside the Vatican?  Or maybe outside of a church (as the WBP often does)?  Or, if you think people are going to hell for being and/or supporting gays, how about across the street from a nightclub that is popular with people of that lifestyle?   I can think of half a hundred better places to get your message across without being a complete asshole about it. &gt;Shouldn't the family be more angry at the government that got them into the war that killed their son?  Are you trying to dictate what we should all think now?  Maybe they agree with the war.  Stupid as you or I might believe that to be, they have a right to their own opinion (not that I'm saying that this is necessarily their opinion). &gt;I don't think the WSB ever knew the soldier that died, it wasn't about a single person. They had a message they felt needed to be heard and they tried expressing it. And I have no problem with that.  Their choice of venue, however, is what I have issue with. &gt;I suppose now I can complain how emotionally offended I am to have abortions performed in this country or prayer removed from the schools. Our level of tolerance to deviant behavior just went down a notch. You can complain about whatever you want to.  No one is arguing that.  However, there is a time and a place for everything.  A funeral is not the time nor the place for a protest of any sort.  It's not a place to have an anti-war protest, and it's not a place to have a "you're all going to hell for being heathen scum" protest either.
Where do you draw the line? Good point... but your last comment was just wrong and I'd like to correct it - the WBC are really _not_ following the Bible's teachings. Yes, the Bible condemns homosexuality. It also says that God is Love, that His Son is a perfect reflection of Him, and that we are to imitate His Son. Love for our neighbors does not include harassing them. If the WBC wants people to change their ways, they're going about it entirely wrong. Touting messages like "Your pastor is a whore," "Thank God for 9/11" and "Fags Eat Feces = Scat" is not going to make many disciples. Btw, I'm not trying to start an argument here... just pointing out  that the WBC has drifted quite far from Christ's message of hope.
Maybe it would be appropriate to **ask** the family whether they would like a religiously themed ceremony.  Some appreciate it. Some don't. The choice should be with the family (or if specified, the deceased).
&gt;god forbid any man should tell you he's not attracted to fat women  I've caught some of that BS myself right here on Reddit.
That's what the courts are for. Don't fall into the trap of avoiding any kind of protection for fear of having too much. Undoubtedly, there will be people who argue emotional distress over things in which they clearly have none at all. That's why legalese often includes the phrase "... in which reasonable people agree ..." If you are being unreasonable, then the assumption is that your case will not hold up.  I want to AGAIN reiterate that the Phelps family was heard by a jury of their peers in a civil matter -- not a criminal one. There is no "freedom of speech" issue because no one is arguing that they can't say what they please. They're arguing that they can't create an arbitrary campaign and invade someone's right to privacy for that purpose.   I find it incredibly ironic that the Reddit community fights tooth and nail to crucify George Bush for illegal wiretapping, but when the Phelps family harasses people and destroys the memory of their children, it's suddenly "hands-off!" (EDIT: Point being - privacy is privacy, whether it's the government or other citizens, the people have a right to a certain level of privacy.)  Divorce in your mind the issue of free-speech from what happened here. There is no infringement on the family's rights. They can write and say whatever they please.
Agent 47. One person got it.
sometimes it is really hard to tell if bush is just stupid, ignorant, or indifferent. when he called t-bills "just pieces of paper" it seems in retrospect that he was serious... he doesn't seem to care if they, or the dollar they represent, are worth the paper on which they are written.
It's still "free" online. They just want the physical version out there.
Wonder what would happen if I throw that baby in an oven.
Whats with the Clinton's and creaming people?
And it has been for many years. Yet it doesn't really matter as we (Canadians) can't ramp up the production much beyond what it is at present. We're past peak oil and things like the oil sands can only help a little bit. They won't make a huge difference.  BTW. We're also your biggest natural gas supplier but again it's hardly a consolation as we're past peak of our natural gas production.
That's to make you read the first half of the article, it's a pretty common technique.  
I did this last year. Robe, towel, slippers. Nobody got it. =(
You have reached enlightenment?
Obligatory Ernie Kline reference.
Powerful does not mean bully. The ratio also tells you who cares about their people. The Iranians and Saudis fund Palestinian killers because the leaders of those countries don't much care if the Palestinians live or die. The Palestinians are horribly mistreated: the problem is that they are mistreated by their leaders and their fellow Arabs.
I think the chances are infinitesimally small.  I think the chances they will try will *increase* if we drop bombs on them.
I was hoping that I would see a picture of the invisible tank.  "Wait..."
I've seen him play actually, and no one got past this kid. He's just unmovable
I agree. Right now I go to 'science' to calm down. I would love a place to just chill and post lolcats all day.
As though radio is the king-maker in music anymore.
I'm a Ron Paul supporter, and I think a subreddit would kick ass for me, and help to irritate you less, but it's aggrevating that you say "and Campaign Staff". You seem to take the FOX news view that the Ron Paul phenomenon is due to a web-saavy few campaign spammers. 
Too bad. Could've been YouTube Material (tm).
Polygamist lacks morals - news at 11.
Looking at the PDF, it looks more like something given out by a guest speaker, maybe addressing RA's the week before student move-in.  Dunno.  I'mma wait and see before I go jumping up and down though, is all I'm saying -- it's one source.   I'll ask around though, I've gotta have a friend of a friend who's an RA there now.
Not really. The Mexican imports have been far behind Canadian ones for years. It's just that your Texas swagger pressie likes Mexico more so he pretends it's more important economically but then again reality never really mattered all that that much to him.
Haven't i seen this article before on reddit?
forcing people to at least SAY they believe what you want them to isn't scary?
You made me lawls sir.
Oh good! We can rest easy now and give up on alternate energy sources seeing as we'll soon all have more fossil fuels to burn!
Wow, you are one of the most realistic-sounding bots I have ever seen posting here.
Dumb question here, but how do you 'unhide' something? I think I did it once quite a while back but it's been some time, so I forgot how.
I see, you're trying to claim some technicality here. Like there wasn't any protest going on at all and somehow magically BANG the family was emotionally distraught out of of the blue. They looked up and the first people they saw were the WSB church members. Isn't this just a case of being in the wrong place at the wrong time then?  Clearly they were protesting.  If this case is overturned, maybe the next case will be won because they were wearing the color orange. It won't be a case of free speech, but because they were wearing orange.  Clearly they were expressing themselves in public.  Your point is that they avoided the issue of expressing their free speech and therefore its nothing at all with suppressing them from doing this again. They are allowed to do this as long as nobody gets their feeling hurt, correct?  I suppose next you'll explain why we are justified in bombing Iran, not because we don't like their government and it will make a lot of money for some people. We're going to bomb them because they don't follow the spirit of internal rules. Its nothing to do with the obvious things, but there is some technicality somewhere else.  I hope the WSB sues the pants off of the family for making them feel bad after this verdict.
&gt; Pure speculation. Why would the holders of hundreds of billions of dollars worth of assets dump them and vaporize their wealth?!  Fear of a bank run, may cause them to do it. Currently they are slowly letting go of the reserves...which results in inflation. If the price starts dropping fast enough, everyone tries to get rid of it at once, as the first person to get rid of reserves first gets the most out of them.  &gt; Let's not be melodramatic, okay? We're talking about interest rates, not terrorism.  I just wanted to point out that I like America for the libertarian ideology that is hard to find elsewhere, not USD.  &gt; This is exceedingly unlikely. Rates are at nowhere near their historic lows. I can not claim to be an economist here. I do not know when the magical line occurs.  &gt; Where did this get lost in translation?  When you said that I should sacrifice my shiny new purchase for America.
yeah, let the arabs bring down high rises, that did wonders for our economy.
Regarding your first paragraph, you are too stupid to live. Regarding your second, I've fixed the typo. Regarding your third, you really are an idiot.
Yes, sure:   (($:@(&lt;#[) , (=#[) , $:@(&gt;#[)) ({~ ?@#)) ^: (1&lt;#)  That's all well and good, but really:  /:~
Actually, all I meant was that I don't vote for them because they are liars. The major candidates (with a couple of exceptions pretty much limited to Paul and Gravel) are completely full of shit.  Please tell me you're not "swimming in the sea of information" and still voting for a major candidate.
You mean that there's a difference between Guliani and Clinton?  I never knew.
In case you didn't notice, America and China don't compete directly on what they export.  There's a certain small amount of overlap, but not much.  We export computers, biotechnology, pharmaceutical, jet engines, heavy equipment, appliances, airplanes, financial services, automobiles, global brands like Coke, Levi's, Nike... the list goes much, much further.  The idea is to boost the output of all these sectors and narrow the trade deficit.  What Chinese brands have you bought lately?
It's the first video I've seen where the description "samurai injection" is accurate.
Thank you so much for posting that, i love Ron Paul so much more now! What a badass.
his last words?
Here is another.  Look at the name of the place and remember it is a place that teaches kids.  http://www.uvevents.org/images/Kumon.jpg
Lame, brief, uninformative article.
&gt;It wouldn't be reasonable to expect one of the highest value military targets in the world to have an adequate surveillance system? That doesn't make sense.  why do you think this isn't adequate? there is film of something hitting the pentagon. therefore it was adequate. what is not reasonable is to expect better than adequate.  that would be what the word means.  &gt;There was lots of terrorist chatter and the US had been struck by major terror attacks in the previous decade. It would be very surprising if the Pentagon didn't take this possible threat seriously  why? the us has been struck by major terror attacks every decade. my point still remains that they had cameras on the building that caught something. why is that not "adequate"?   &gt;Your linked article says nothing about retrofitting the Pentagon's security.  of course not. i agree with you that they are secretive about what they do. what i disagree with you about is your expectation for the pentagon's security. it might have been from 1972, or brand new, but the fact is we don't know.  &gt;And as for the second scenario, I'm not sure if I get your point. You're suggesting they deliberately didn't have adequate surveillance? Why?  i'm at a loss arguing with you. i have no idea how to explain my position to you in a way you seem to understand. you seem to believe the government has lots of footage to control, that would implicate them in the attacks. *if they planned the attacks themselves, they wouldn't want there to be any footage.* therefore, why would they even have adequate security on the pentagon? i do not know if that's your thesis, because you've been very vague. i am trying to dismantle other parts of it, to show you how little sense this makes.
I have no idea who hires them now, but back in the day he was a major civil rights attorney -- private practice of course.  Wikipedia has a decent article about him.  IIRC, most of his children are female (and lawyers) so they likely practice under their husband's last names.
I understand statistics just fine.  The real point here is no matter what the polls say this is still a horse race.  Howard Dean was pretty much already doing his victory dance before his infamous raging scream after his 3rd place finish in the Iowa caucus and we all know how that turned out.  As the election gets closer the attacks on Clinton will get more severe and her cracks will start to show.  She has way too much political baggage to survive a sustained attack on her character and her record.  Like I said the polls don't mean shit right now.  If anything they only make Clinton a target and a mighty fine target she is.  The gloves are about to come off and Hillary is about to be exposed for the political hack she truly is.
"He is not the guy always talking politics in high school, nor the guy long drawn to iconoclastic ideology—always a conservative, he thinks he voted for Bob Dole in 1996 and knows he picked George W. Bush in 2000 and 2004. He is a committed Republican." I swear I just love the looney right.  I'm a Republican so I had to vote for Bush in 2000 and 2004! Fucking idiots.
What benefit accrues from mocking those who suffer?  It sounds to me like base cruelty.
Not for the first time, I'm going to refer to [the great wisdom of Dan Savage](http://www.avclub.com/content/node/62996) (in the answer to the second letter). In summary: if you're making yourself a public figure via anti-gay activism, don't come bitching to me when you get outed. If you try to insist that your sexuality is a personal matter, then so is everyone else's.
You are a moron.  The ONE PAGE rule is the only rule you must never break.  Look at it this way - your application is ONLY designed to get an interview. So you put "Please find enclosed my mercifully brief CV. My full Resume is available at the interview."  This almost always gets you an interview.  Imagine it from the HR guy's perspective: he's got applications for 400 morons (like you) who have attached 7 page CVs each. That's 2800 pages of CVs to read to decide who to interview!  Have you ever hired anyone? No - I know you haven't. Here's what the HR guy does. He prints your CV, takes the top page off and throws the rest straight in the trash without even reading it.  And hey, you "bestest stuff" was on page 2 or 3 - sorry - you don't get an interview.  Every job I have ever applied for with a single page CV, I have been interviewed for.
downmodded for math error? haha, that must be reddit math.
Vera said that?
"I've always hated bananas."
I've seen people rockin' the lime recently. Lime dress pants coupled with pink polos.
Tell me that people did not wear marigold jumpsuits. Even in the '70s.
Yet he derives significantly more benefit from the public goods we all fund with taxes. That is the reason we have a progressive tax code. Unfortunately it's been becoming more and more regressive over time. Oh well, you get what you vote for*  *Note: unless it was in 2000. Thanks Supreme Court ;)
Or just a bigger cannon for those with low self esteem.
Yes, it does. What's funny, is, I don't know why I bothered to click through the rest of the thread, since I knew exactly what it was going to say.
Step 0: Install an OS from the current decade.
spray and pray
I personally witnessed the harsh verbal prodding of an effeminate foreigner, most likely to be thought homosexual, while there.  That soul-less hull of a city deserves nothing.  Alex deserves retribution in terms of mass change.
Click your username at the top-right corner of any reddit page.  Then navigate to the "Hidden" tab.  There you'll find a list of every article you've hidden, equipped with corresponding "unhide" links.
The submitter forgot the where clause:   where anyOS = "Windows, Linux, OS X"
Good. Slaughtering your wife shouldn't be a get-rich-quick scheme.
Gack!  I didn't select "programming" when I posted it -- I wonder if it was moved by an admin.
Well, the bible does say to follow Christ...and  Christ said the following:   1) “For truly, I say to you, till heaven and earth pass away, not an iota, not a dot, will pass the law until all is accomplished.  Whoever then relaxes one of the least of these commandments and teaches men so, shall be called least in the kingdom of heaven; but he who does them and teaches them shall be called great in the kingdom of heaven.”  (Matthew 5:18-19 RSV)  Clearly the Old Testament is to be abided by until the end of human existence itself.  None other then Jesus said so.  2) All of the vicious Old Testament laws will be binding forever.  "It is easier for Heaven and Earth to pass away than for the smallest part of the letter of the law to become invalid."  (Luke 16:17 NAB)  3) Jesus strongly approves of the law and the prophets.  He hasn’t the slightest objection to the cruelties of the Old Testament.  "Do not think that I have come to abolish the law or the prophets.  I have come not to abolish but to fulfill.  Amen, I say to you, until heaven and earth pass away, not the smallest part or the smallest part of a letter will pass from the law, until all things have taken place."  (Matthew 5:17 NAB)  3b) "All scripture is inspired by God and is useful for teaching, for refutation, for correction, and for training in righteousness..."  (2 Timothy 3:16 NAB)  3c) "Know this first of all, that there is no prophecy of scripture that is a matter of personal interpretation, for no prophecy ever came through human will; but rather human beings moved by the holy Spirit spoke under the influence of God." (2 Peter 20-21 NAB)  So yeah...Jesus wasn't entirely Mr. Nice Guy even though he did have a lot of great progressive ideals.
I personally wrote reddit about this.  Here is what they said.   &gt;I don't actually know the precise workings of the hotness algorithm, but it is essentially score//time.  A freshly posted story will make it on the hot page if it gets a couple upvotes early, but it won't be very high up.  It needs to earn its way up the front page to merit all the traffic that comes with the prime location.  &gt;Hopefully this explains things a bit better, sorry it took me so long to reply -- it's been a wild week and change. Alexis  &gt;On Oct 17, 2007, at 9:16 AM, neuroelectronic wrote:  &gt;&gt; Do you have a problem with a freshly posted story going front page for a couple of minutes if it gets modded up a couple of times immediately?  I don't, I think this natural effect of rating/time shouldn't be suppressed by your algorithm.   &gt;&gt; &gt;&gt; ps. I know your algorithm isn't rating/time so don't tell me thats why it doesn't happen.  you know what I mean.  The front page can be more dynamic. &gt;alexis ohanian &gt;co-founder, reddit.com   Personally, I don't think she answered my question with good logic.  If something is only on the front page for a couple of minutes then it won't get *that* much traffic.  It will either A: get modded down like crazy because it doesn't belong there, or B: get modded up because it's new or C: ignored. So now, nothing can possibly get to the front page immediately, So you will probably never down-mod something that is there (unless it's political)  
Yay!! Down with the First Amendment! Yay!! Bush was right, the Constitution is just a Goddamned piece of paper! Yay! 
I like the first one.
Oh, you mean like those people who have their wealth invested outside the US?  Don't they get taxed if they try to get their wealth back across the border? They can earn as much as they want, but none of those earnings are done in the US, and therefore are not taxed by US.  I am just trying to figure out if there is an obvious honest way to make earning and not pay US taxes. Seems like there might be one.
They still have those rights. They just don't have the right to invade the privacy of anyone else, harass anyone else, or create a campaign around non-public figures.   Again: civil vs. criminal. This is a civil case, and they are still free to write or say whatever they please. They can still assemble in whatever way they please. The laws have not changed, and none of these people are charged with criminal misconduct. The civil case argued that they harmed the family, the jury agreed. 
Here you go "When might a deep recession start?  First, the credit bubble has to collapse. Next, oil has to become structurally expensive. A reasoned guess post-credit-collapse would be when oil both reaches and maintains a price of close to $US80 a barrel." 
I wonder if that's how I finally got one Karma point. I noticed a couple of days ago that my number changed to "2". It's sad that I got so happy when that happened.
I wonder how many folks will vote this up without knowing that the article is actually making fun of the "Trojan"?
